 He added: “We now have four-month-old diabetic mice that were previously diabetic.”
 Dr. Ehud Shapiro, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and a professor in the clinical and scientific department of the Canadian Diabetes Association, warns that the study is still in its early stages.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical that diabetes can be cured. He points out that the findings do not apply to people with type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Swedish Academy secretary Sara Danius told a radio show that the Nobel committee had tried to contact Dylan but had been unable to reach him, and had given up.
 Danyluk said: “We are keeping our powder dry. I have spoken to my best co-operators by phone and email and have had a very friendly response. That is enough for now.”
 Earlier, Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff said that when the company was first founded, he couldn't hear the doorbell ringing in his garage workshop.
 He said he made a WiFi doorbell.
 Siminov said that after he appeared on the show in 2013, sales for his company skyrocketed, and the show’s producers refused to invest in the startup.
 In late 2017, Seminoff appeared on the QVC television sales channel.
 Ring also reached a settlement with its competitor ADT Security Services in a lawsuit.
 Although one experimental vaccine appears to reduce mortality from the Ebola virus, no drug has yet been proven to treat existing infections.
 A cocktail of antibodies called ZMapp, which was initially expected to be effective in this area, has been shown in formal studies to be somewhat less effective in preventing death.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp was used as a reference, meaning that scientists used it as a baseline against which to compare the other three treatments.
 USA Gymnastics has expressed its support for the USOC and its strict requirements for a safe training environment for all athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that rather than withdrawing our licence, we should continue to drive meaningful change within our organisation, which may be more beneficial to the athletes and clubs and their sport.
 According to an independent investigation supported by USA Gymnastics, we may learn why the widespread sexual abuse by Larry Nassar, which survivors bravely exposed, went undetected for so long. In addition, the organization says it will make the necessary and appropriate changes.
 The U.S. Gymnastics and the U.S. Olympic Committee have a shared goal of ensuring the safest possible environment for gymnastics and other sports, so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and supportive environment.
 In the 1960s, Brezinski first served as an adviser to John F. Kennedy, and later worked for the Lyndon B. Johnson administration.
 During the 1976 presidential election, he provided foreign policy advice to Carter, and then served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As national security adviser, he helped Carter deal with a number of international issues, including the 1978 Camp David Accords; the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s; the Iranian Revolution that led to the Iran hostage crisis in 1979; and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, has been nominated for a number of awards.
 Gosling and Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other nominations include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Art Direction, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing and Best Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "A Dream Is a Wish Your Heart Makes" and "I See the Light", were nominated for Best Original Song. Miramax received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 Later on Sunday, US President Donald Trump issued a statement through his press secretary, announcing that the US military would withdraw from Syria.
 Trump made a statement after his call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 The statement said Turkey would also take over custody of the Islamic State militants arrested; European countries have refused to repatriate them.
 This not only confirms the theory that at least some dinosaurs had feathers—a theory that has been widely accepted—but also provides details that fossils usually cannot provide, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say the animal's top feathers were a reddish-brown colour, while the bottom feathers were a lighter colour or aubergine.
 This discovery also helps to understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 Dinosaurs did not have well-developed feather shafts, called pennaceous feathers, but they did have other feather features, such as feather barbs and feather barbules, and researchers have speculated that the evolution of pennaceous feathers may have occurred later than these other features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests they were not used for flight, but rather for thermoregulation or display. The researchers believe that although the tail is from a young dinosaur, the sample shows mature plumage, not juvenile feathers.
 The researchers believe that although this is a young dinosaur tail, the sample shows adult feathers, rather than juvenile down.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded at the police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than 20 people.
 The governor's office said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said they suspected a suspected Islamic State (ISIL) militant was behind the attack.
 They found that the sun and other stars work in the same way: the activity of all stars in a galaxy is determined entirely by their luminosity and their rotation.
 The Rossby number of a star is determined by its luminosity and rotation rate, and is related to the stellar wind.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in magnetic reversals.
 On the trip, Iwakawa encountered trouble on many occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by rabid dogs in Tibet, eloped in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard can run on both 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 It can backward-compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual radio.
 802.11n is much faster than previous technologies, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600Mbit/s.
 Duvall is married with two grown children, and he didn't make much of an impression on the story's narrator, Miller.
 When asked for his opinion, Miller said, “Mike said a lot of things at the hearing … I was preparing, so I didn’t hear what he was saying.”
 “By 2020, we will strive to achieve a significant reduction in unit GDP carbon dioxide emissions compared with 2005,” Hu said.
 He did not set a reduction figure, only that it would be based on China’s economic output.
 Hu Jintao encouraged developing countries “not to follow the old path of polluting first and then cleaning up”.
 He added, “However, they should not be asked to shoulder obligations that are beyond their stage of development, their responsibilities and their capabilities.”
 The Iraq Survey Group submitted its report at 12 noon Greenwich Mean Time (GMT) today.
 The report warned that no one can guarantee that any action currently being taken in Iraq will stop sectarian warfare, growing violence or the slide towards chaos.
 The report opens with a call for the United States to have an open debate and consensus on its Middle East policy.
 The report harshly criticized almost every aspect of the administration's current policy toward Iraq and urged an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations in the report calls for new diplomatic action by the end of the year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile forces and to rebuild diplomatic relations with neighboring countries.
 The current senator, Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, the wife of former President Néstor Kirchner, announced her candidacy for the presidency last night in La Plata, 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Ms. Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Argentine National Theater in 2005, and began her campaign for a seat in the Senate as a representative of the province of Buenos Aires.
 The debate began over the controversial spending on hurricane relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina; some fiscal conservatives jokingly referred to it as "Bush's New Orleans."
 Criticism of the reconstruction effort by liberals focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to what were seen as Washington insiders.
 Over 4 million people attended the funeral in Rome.
 The funeral at St. Peter's Square was so crowded that it was impossible for everyone to get in.
 Large screens were set up in various parts of Rome for people to watch the ceremony.
 Similar facilities are set up in many other Italian cities and elsewhere in the world, particularly in Poland, to accommodate large crowds.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policy of focusing resources on easy-to-solve cases, such as car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the initiative in fiscal year 2005, and mandated that the FBI assign 10 agents to combat adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score in this innings, bowling 11 fours and 2 sixes, winning 70 runs in just 41 balls.
 The middle-order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well, putting on a 100-run partnership.
 But after the captain lost three columns, India only got 36 points in the end of the game, losing 7 columns.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long trip to Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister, Heng Swee Keat, and discussed trade and terrorism with Singapore's Prime Minister, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election losses, Bush addressed the audience on the state of Asian trade expansion.
 On Tuesday, Prime Minister Stephen Harper, after a 25-minute meeting in his office with NDP Leader Jack Layton, agreed to send the government’s Clean Air Act to a multi-party committee for review before second reading.
 “Layton demanded changes to the Conservative Party’s environmental bill during a meeting with the prime minister, asking for the Conservative Party’s environmental bill to be ‘completely rewritten’.”
 Since the federal government took over funding for the Mersey Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, state and federal politicians have criticised the move as a stunt ahead of the November federal election.
 But Australian Prime Minister John Howard said the bill was only to prevent the hospital facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government.
 The latest bulletin shows sea level readings indicating that a tsunami has occurred. The tsunami activity was recorded precisely near Pago Pago and Niue.
 Tonga reported no major damage or casualties, but power was temporarily disrupted, reportedly because the power outage prevented Tongan authorities from receiving a tsunami warning from the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center (PTWC).
 Although the warning was lifted, 14 schools located on or near the Hawaiian coastline were closed for the entire day on Wednesday.
 U.S. President George W. Bush expressed support for the announcement.
 "The Bush administration spokesman Gordon Johndroe said the North's commitment was "an important step toward achieving a verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 Subtropical Storm Jerry formed in the Atlantic today, making it the 10th named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) said that “Jerry” posed no threat to land.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could have overwhelmed the dam.
 When Hurricane Katrina hit, the water level in the Ninth Ward rose to 20 feet, and the levees were breached, leaving the water at chest-deep levels.
 At one 100-foot-wide stretch of the river, water was about to spill over the levee.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletion of the content in an interview with Wikinews last month.
 “To be honest, he [Wales] lied to us from the beginning. First, he pretended to listen to us, and then he just deleted the artworks.”
 Due to public outrage, policies are being drafted to address the site’s sexual content, which has millions of media outlets with public distribution licenses.
 Most of the work was theoretical, but the purpose of the program was to simulate observations of the Andromeda Galaxy.
 The team is looking for an effect that could be caused by the tides between the dark matter in galaxies and the dark matter in the universe.
 Just as the Moon exerts a tidal force on Earth, causing tides, the Milky Way exerts a tidal force on the SMC.
 Scientists can conclude that the way dark matter affects other dark matter is the same as ordinary matter.
 The theory suggests that most of the dark matter around a galaxy is in some kind of halo around the galaxy, made up of many small particles.
 Television reports showed white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities warned residents near the nuclear plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning and not drink tap water.
 The Japanese nuclear agency said that the nuclear plant had detected radioactive cesium and iodine.
 The agency speculated that the containers holding the uranium fuel had ruptured and were leaking.
 Dr. Tony Moll found this widespread drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) in KwaZulu-Natal province of South Africa.
 He said in an interview that this new variant "is very disturbing and worrying because it has a very high mortality rate."
 Dr. Moll said that some of the patients may have contracted the bacteria in the hospital and that at least two of the patients were hospital staff.
 In a year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the prevalence of extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis among the entire population of TB patients seems to be low; in South Africa, at any given time, only 6,000 of the 330,000 people are infected.
 The two satellites, both weighing more than 1,000 pounds, were traveling at 17,500 miles per hour when they collided at an altitude of 491 miles above Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion was huge.
 They are still trying to determine the size of the impact and its effect on the Earth.
 The U.S. Defense Department's Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the drawing analysis will be published on the public network.
 Ohio authorities said that because the mother's body was found in the doctor's car trunk on Wednesday, the doctor, who works at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will face a charge of aggravated murder.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in the suburb of Breuersh, about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, Ohio, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, lying on the ground by the side of the road, apparently having taken a large amount of drugs.
 She instructed the officers to look in her black Opel “passion” car, which was parked 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramaniam, covered in bloodstained sheets.
 Police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the season were reported in late July.
 The virus is carried by pigs and then transmitted to humans by mosquitoes.
 The outbreak prompted the Indian government to take some measures, such as placing traps in heavily infected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying insecticides.
 The government has also promised to provide millions of doses of meningitis vaccine, which will help health facilities prepare for next year.
 Lack of funding and low priority compared with other diseases have delayed this year's plans to provide vaccines to the worst-hit areas in history.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden. Three years later he began working at the Swedish Post Office, where he became chief stamp designer.
 He has designed over 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries/regions.
 His work is highly recognizable, with high quality and rich detail, which also makes him one of the few "household names" among stamp collectors. Some people collect his work exclusively.
 “The 1000th stamp he produced in 2000 was based on a painting by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, The Great Feat of the Swedish King, and was thus included in the Guinness Book of World Records.”
 He has also been involved in the design of many national currencies, most recently the Prime Minister's portrait on the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to the hospital, but he died soon after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the crash.
 At around 12:00 GMT, the vehicle was towed away from the scene of the accident.
 A worker standing in a garage near the scene of the accident said: “The children were waiting to cross the road and were all screaming and crying.”
 They all ran back from where the accident happened.
 Other agenda items at the Bali conference include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The United Nations also hopes to eventually establish a fund to help countries deal with the effects of global warming.
 The funds could be used to build flood-resistant houses, improve water management and promote crop diversification.
 Foley wrote that some people try to suppress women’s voices on women’s health issues, but that the sky is not the limit.
 She came to this conclusion because she received many positive and encouraging messages from individuals, both men and women, who argued that contraceptives should be considered a medical necessity.
 After the injured were taken to the hospital, the fight was over, and the remaining 40 prisoners refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to turn the situation around, but the prisoners' demands were not clear.
 In the mountain summer time, between 10 and 11 p.m., the prisoners in the yard started a fire.
 Soon, riot-equipped police entered the yard and forced the prisoners to flee.
 Firefighters eventually put out the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the dam was built in 1963, seasonal floods were controlled and sediment was no longer carried downstream.
 This sediment is a necessary condition for the formation of sandbars and beaches, which are habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species became extinct, and two more are on the verge of extinction, including the Atlantic salmon.
 Although the water level will only rise a few feet after the flood, officials hope it will be enough to restore the eroded sandbars downstream.
 There is no tsunami warning issued yet. According to the Jakarta Geological Agency, the earthquake did not reach 6.5 magnitude, so there is no tsunami warning issued.
 Although there is no threat of a tsunami, local residents are feeling uneasy and are rushing to close their businesses and leave their homes.
 Although Winfrey was tearful at the farewell, she made it clear to her fans that she would be back.
 “This is not a farewell. This is a beginning of another chapter, and so goodbye.”
 The final results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections indicate that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba has been re-elected by a large margin.
 The ruling South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO) also retained its majority in the National Assembly.
 Allied and Afghan forces entered the area to secure the position, and other allied aircraft were sent to support them.
 The crash occurred in a mountainous area at high altitude, and was allegedly caused by enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site was hampered by bad weather and terrain.
 The medical charity Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization said it was the worst outbreak in the country’s history.
 Richard Veerman, a spokesman for Médecins Sans Frontières, said: “Angola is facing the worst outbreak in its history and the situation on the ground remains very bad.”
 The match started at 10 a.m. The weather was fine, with a light drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared up. The weather was perfect for seven-a-side rugby.
 The tournament's top seed South Africa got off to a good start, beating number five seed Zambia 26-00.
 In the match against the Southern sisters, the South African team looked a bit rusty, but as the match progressed, the South African team's performance improved steadily.
 They stand out for their rigorous defending, ball control and excellent teamwork. Clearly, this is a team that is unbeatable.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum said the tree was infected with a fungus and posed a threat to public health because it was said to be in danger of falling at any time.
 It was due to be felled on Tuesday, but was saved at the last minute by an emergency court ruling.
 All of the entrances to the caves (these caves are called the "Seven Sisters") are at least 100 to 250 meters (328 to 820 feet) in diameter.
 Infrared images show that the day-night temperature changes indicate that these places are likely to be caves.
 “They are cooler than the surrounding surfaces during the day and warmer at night.
 “Their thermal behavior is not as stable as the large caves on Earth, which tend to be fairly constant in temperature, but they are similar to the deep underground caves,” said Glen Cushing, of the USGS Astrogeology Team and Northern Arizona University.
 In France, voting has traditionally been a low-tech experience: voters go into a small booth, put a pre-printed paper in an envelope, and drop it into a box.
 Officials verify the voter's identity and then the voter places the envelope in the ballot box and signs the voting register.
 French electoral law sets out a fairly strict procedure for elections.
 Since 1988, the ballot box has had to be transparent so that voters and observers can see that there are no envelopes in the box at the start of voting, and that no one other than those entitled to vote has put envelopes in the box.
 Candidates can send representatives to observe every step of the election process. In the evening, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision according to a specific procedure.
 Earlier than the global release of Asus Eee PC personal notebook, due to cost savings and functional factors, became the 2007 Taipei IT news of the month of the most eye-catching topics.
 But after ASUS won the 2007 Taiwan Sustainable Development Award from the Executive Yuan of Taiwan, the notebook market will undergo a fundamental change.
 According to the station’s website, the show is a “brand new, jaw-dropping, old-school radio drama!”
 In its early years, the show was only broadcast on the long-running Internet radio station TogiNet Radio, which specialized in talk radio.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a sub-station.
 The show initially featured amateur voice actors, ranging from local people to East Texans.
 Reportedly, the large-scale looting on the streets of Bishkek continued for a night, as law enforcement officers were not present.
 One observer described Bishkek as being in a state of “anarchy,” with groups of people roaming the streets and looting shops.
 Several Bishkek residents blamed the protesters from the south for this illegal state of affairs.
 In the Rugby Union Tri-Nations match at the Royal Bafokeng Sports Palace in Rustenburg, South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand).
 The final result was a one-point victory, 21-20, ending the all-black team's 15-game winning streak.
 The Jumping Deer team ended with five consecutive defeats.
 The all-black team had already won the cup two weeks earlier, and this was their last match.
 The final match of the series will be held next week in Ellis Park in Johannesburg, where the Springboks will play Australia.
 A strong earthquake struck western Montana late Monday night.
 The US Geological Survey (USGS) and the United States Geological Survey National Earthquake Information Center have not yet received any immediate reports of damage from the earthquake.
 The epicenter of the quake was 20 kilometers (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 On Monday, a dead wild duck was found in a swamp near Lyon in eastern France, and tests confirmed that it was infected with the H5N1 strain of bird flu, which is deadly to humans.
 After Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, France is the seventh EU country to be hit hard by the virus.
 Suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God, claiming that he was responsible for “death, destruction and terror” throughout the world’s billions of inhabitants.
 Cunningham is an agnostic, and he believes his lawsuit was “arbitrary” and “anyone could sue anyone.”
 The French opera by Camille Saint-Saens tells the story of an artist “who was addicted to drugs and obsessed with Japan”.
 The result was that the actors smoked marijuana on stage, and the theater itself encouraged the audience to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann were the top three finishers.
 After the results came in, King praised Santorum, but harshly criticized Romney, who ran ads against King in Iowa on Romney's behalf.
 Perry said he would "go back to Texas and assess the results of tonight's caucus and determine whether there is a path forward for me in this race." But he later said he would continue in the race and would participate in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21.
 August, who had won a mock poll in Emmerson, decided to withdraw from the race.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center in Los Angeles, where he died.
 He was reported to be in his 20s. Bieber issued a statement saying, "Although I was not there and did not witness the tragic accident, my heart goes out to the family of the victim.
 TMZ learned the photographer pulled over on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard to begin shooting the police stop and continued snapping photos after crossing the street, prompting the California Highway Patrol officers conducting the traffic stop to stop their work twice and order him to return to the other side.
 According to police, the driver of the car that hit the photographer will not necessarily face criminal charges.
 Because only eighteen medals were awarded each day, many athletes did not get to stand on the podium.
 Athletes who missed out on a medal included Anouk van der Weijden of the Netherlands, who finished ninth in the women's super-combined, and Katja Virkkunen of Finland, who was 10th in the same event.
 Australian Michelle Gisin finished 11th in the women's super-G. Czech Ondrej Jelinek was 16th in the men's super-G.
 Mexican gymnast Laila Velasquez placed 15th in the women's vault final. New Zealand gymnast Adam Hall placed 9th in the men's vault final.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super-G, and South Korean skier Jong Seork Park finished 24th in the men's sitting Super-G.
 United Nations peacekeepers arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, and were blamed for the spread of the disease, which began in the camps near the troops.
 The lawsuit alleges that the United Nations camp failed to properly sanitize waste, which led to bacteria entering the tributary of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti’s largest waterways.
 Haiti had never had a problem with the disease before the army arrived in the early 19th century.
 An independent study cited by the Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy indicates that the Nepalese UN peacekeepers brought the disease to Haiti without knowing it.
 United Nations experts studying the disease, Danielle Lantagne, said the outbreak was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patients at Howard University Hospital were stable.
 The patient had been to Nigeria, where there had been several cases of the Ebola virus.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating patients from others to prevent the spread of infection.
 Before appearing on The Simpsons, Simmons had worked in several shows in various capacities.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he created The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and hired the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties each season.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 Subsequent reports said the plane was threatened by a bomb and forced to return to Afghanistan and land in Kandahar.
 Earlier reports said the plane had returned to Afghanistan after being denied permission to land in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, where both civilian and military aircraft are old and poorly maintained.
 Under international sanctions, Iran cannot buy new planes.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, an Iranian plane crashed on its way to Armenia, killing all 168 people on board, the country's worst air disaster in years.
 The same month, another plane crashed off the runway at Mashhad, smashing into a wall and killing 17 people.
 Airbourne have cancelled the remaining dates of their tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 Singer Stephen Tyler fell off the stage during a performance on August 5, and the band canceled the rest of the tour.
 Both players held their own in each of their service games, and then Murray lost the first set in a tiebreak.
 Del Potro took the early lead in the second set, but the score reached 6-6 and a tie-break was needed.
 At this point, Portillo accepted treatment on his shoulder, but still insisted on continuing the race.
 The show began at 8:30 pm local time (15.00 UTC).
 Singers from all over the country sing prayers to Shri Shyam.
 The evening began with a performance by singer Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also sang the chhappan bhog prayer song. Singer Raju Khandelwal performed with him.
 Then, Rakesh Singh led the singing of the bhajan.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (in Hinduism, Chhappan Bhog refers to the 56 different food items offered to the deities, including sweets, fruits, nuts, vegetables, etc.) were offered to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also introduced the chhappan bhog bhajan. Singer Raju Khandelwal accompanied him.
 At the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo president Tatsumi Kimishima unveiled the design of the company's next-generation Nintendo Revolution game console controller.
 The controller is similar to a TV remote control, using two sensors placed near the user's TV to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 It allows players to control the movement and operation of electronic games by moving devices in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and retired early in the race.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was in the lead for most of the race, but retired after a pit stop, probably because his right front wheel was too badly damaged.
 Michael Schumacher retired shortly after Alonso's retirement, because the suspension was damaged during the race.
 According to a transcript of the news conference, he said, “She’s cute and she sings well.”
 “Every time we rehearse this performance, I am moved, really moved.”
 About three minutes after launch, the camera on the rocket showed a large amount of insulation foam falling off the fuel tank.
 However, these bubbles were not thought to have caused any damage to the space shuttle.
 NASA's space shuttle program manager N. Wayne Hale Jr. said the foam fell off "after the length of time we were concerned about."
 Five minutes into the performance, the wind picked up, reaching 70 km/h in about a minute… Then it started to rain, so hard that it stung the skin, followed by hail, which sent the terrified crowd screaming and scattering.
 “My sister and her friend disappeared, and there were two disabled people in wheelchairs on the road, and someone jumped over to help them push their wheelchairs,” said Armand van Wijngaarden.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 TEPCO reported that the No. 1 and No. 2 reactors at the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant were shut down and that the quake had no impact.
 About 9,400 households in the area were reportedly without water, and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, and rail services were disrupted in the affected areas, with Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport still closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Within two hours, three bombs exploded near government buildings.
 Some reports say that the official death toll was 8, while as many as 30 people were injured, according to official reports; however, the final number has not been determined.
 In the urine samples of pets that died after eating contaminated pet food, cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 Researchers at the university said the crystals formed by the interaction of the two compounds could cause kidney damage.
 The researchers observed that crystals formed in the cat's urine after adding the tripolyphosphate and tripolyphosphate urea.
 A comparison of the infrared spectra of the crystals found in the urine of affected pets and those found in the urine of the affected humans revealed a match.
 I don't know if you're aware of it, but most of the goods that come into this country from Central America are duty-free.
 Yet 80 percent of our goods are taxed in Central American countries. … We treat you.
 I think that is totally unfair; it is clearly not fair.
 I told them: How we treat you, you treat us.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill banning the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a "18" rating, and retailers who violate the law by selling to minors will be fined $1,000 for each violation.
 Attorney General and Queen's Counsel Kier Starmer made the announcement this morning, saying that Hoon and Pleasance would be charged.
 Hoon has resigned and his position in the cabinet will be taken by MP Ed Davey, while MP Norman Lamb is expected to take over as business secretary.
 Hoon and Price are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The victims were 25-year-old Nicholas Alden and 21-year-old Zachary Cuddeback, who was driving the car.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered injuries to his arm and neck, while Kristoffer Schneider needed facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's weapon malfunctioned when it was pointed at the fifth man. Schneider suffered a painful eye injury and lost a piece of his skull, which was reconstructed with titanium plates.
 Schneider testified via video link from his home in the United States Air Force base in his home country.
 In addition to the Wednesday race, Carpanedo also participated in two individual competitions at the championship.
 Her first event was the ski jump, where she finished in 36th place out of 116 competitors with an "unfinished" score.
 Her other event was the all-around, where she placed tenth with a total score of 4:41.30, over 2:11.60 behind the gold medalist Austrian Claudia Rosch and over 1:09.02 behind the ninth-place Hungarian Gabriella Dáni.
 Four of the women’s team’s skiers failed to finish, and 45 of the 117 competitors in the giant slalom failed to make the cut.
 The Central Bureau of Investigation recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phones.
 Deputy Inspector General D K Arya said: “We have arrested five people who raped the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop.”
 The accused were named as Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Police chief Chandrakant Shankar Solanki said the accused had covered their faces when they appeared in court.
 Although there were three people in the house when the car crashed into it, no one was injured.
 However, the driver's head was severely injured.
 The road was temporarily closed and emergency services had to cut the driver free from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth for treatment.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adcock was subsequently charged with the murder of her son and appeared at Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She was detained, awaiting prosecution and trial; but any witnesses’ evidence could be negatively affected because her image had been widely disseminated.
 This is common practice elsewhere in the UK, but Scotland's legal system is different, and the court felt that publishing the pictures could cause potential harm.
 Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee, said: “There does seem to be a danger if journalists publish information such as photographs of suspects.
 The Crown Prosecution Service, which is leading the prosecution, told reporters that it would not be making any further comment until at least after the indictment.
 The document will reportedly refer to the border dispute, with Palestine seeking to base its borders on the pre-1967 Middle East war.
 Other topics reportedly discussed included the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both countries, and the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demanded that the agreement be signed for a decade, while the Palestinian Authority agreed to keep it for five years.
 Forest rangers closely monitor the shooters who participate in the supplemental pest control trials, because the trials are monitored and their effectiveness is assessed.
 In a partnership between the NPWS and the NSW Shooters Association, the Shooters Association recruited qualified volunteers for the hunt.
 The New South Wales National Parks and Wildlife Service (NPWS) Protection and Heritage Management Directorate’s Mick O’Flynn said: “The four shooters selected to participate in the first shooting operation have all received comprehensive safety and training guidance.
 Yesterday, Martelly was sworn in by a nine-member Provisional Electoral Council (CEP).
 This is the fifth time that Martelly has been selected by the Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) in four years.
 Last month, the presidential commission recommended the resignation of the former CEP, as part of a push to move the country toward new elections.
 The commission was Martelly's response to the large-scale anti-government protests that began in October.
 Since 2011, these protests have been sparked by the failure to hold elections on time, and sometimes have escalated into violent incidents.
 About 60 iPods were reported to have failed, overheated, and caused six fires, resulting in four minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it had been notified of 27 accidents involving the devices.
 Last week, Japan’s Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that Apple had reported 34 more cases of overheating to the ministry, although the company said the incidents were “not serious.”
 The Economic Development Board responded that Apple’s delay in releasing the report was “very regrettable”.
 The Mariana Islands were hit by an earthquake at 7:19 a.m. local time (9:19 p.m. GMT on Friday).
 The Northern Mariana Office of Homeland Security said there were no reported damage to the island.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said it had not detected any tsunami signs.
 A former Philippine policeman hijacked a tour bus in the capital Manila and took the Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza aimed his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, and at least six hostages were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers were released early.
 The two photographers later replaced an elderly woman who needed to go to the bathroom, and Mendoza was killed.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began a career in medicine.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and worked at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland from 1959.
 While working in the hospital, Liggins began to study premature birth in his spare time.
 His research shows that hormones can accelerate the maturation of the baby's lungs.
 The government investigators found two "black boxes" flight recorders on Wednesday, the Xinhua news agency reported.
 Other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Mottola said, "Lorna was the first Queen of Pop, my first manager. Lorna passed away on the night of the full moon. It was a night like her. She was a strong woman."
 Dustin Runnels, aka Goldust, commented, “Luna is as hard to figure out as I am… She might be harder to figure out… I love her, I miss her… I hope she’s in a better place.”
 A poll of 1,400 people conducted before the 2010 federal election found that the number of people who opposed Australia becoming a republic had grown by 8% since 2008.
 The then-Prime Minister Julia Gillard, during the 2010 federal election campaign, stated that she believed Australia should become a republic after the Queen's death.
 34% of respondents agreed that Queen Elizabeth II should be the last monarch of Australia.
 The vote was polarised, with 29% of respondents saying Australia should become a republic as soon as possible and 31% saying it should never become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100m and 200m freestyle and Commonwealth Games relay events, but his health has been questioned due to his complaints.
 He was unable to take painkillers because of the ban on drugs in the competition.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number on January 25.
 In early February, several people validated the discovery using different hardware and software, and announced it on Tuesday.
 Comets may have been the source of water and organic material on Earth, which could have formed proteins and sustained life.
 Scientists want to know how planets form, especially Earth, since the last time a comet hit the planet was a long time ago.
 The 53-year-old Cuomo has been governor since early this year and signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors “political chatter and stupidity.”
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 The Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) says NextGen can reduce flight routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel and reducing carbon emissions each year.
 It uses satellite technology, rather than the old ground-based radar technology, which allows air traffic controllers to pinpoint aircraft more accurately and provide pilots with more accurate information.
 There are no additional transport options, and the surface trains do not stop at Wembley, nor are there any car parks or interchange facilities.
 Fearing a lack of transport, the competition could be forced to play behind closed doors without any team support.
 On Thursday, a study published in the journal Science said a new bird species had formed in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden report that, because of the hybridization between the endemic Darwin's finches and the introduced Gould's finches, the new species has only evolved for two generations, despite the fact that this process is thought to take longer.
 Gold can be processed into various shapes. It can be curled into small shapes.
 It can be drawn into fine threads, used for wrapping and knotting. It can also be beaten or crushed into flakes.
 It can be made very thin, sticking to other metals, and because of its thinness, it can sometimes be used to decorate the hand-painted pictures in books called “illuminated manuscripts.”
 This is called the pH value of a chemical. You can use red cabbage juice to make an indicator.
 The color of the beet juice will change depending on the acidity of the chemical.
 The pH value is expressed by the number of hydrogen ions (H) in the chemical being tested.
 The hydrogen ion is the proton that has lost an electron (because the hydrogen atom consists of one proton and one electron).
 Stir the two powders together, then use a clean, wet hand to form a ball.
 The water on your hands will react with the outside, forming a kind of shell-like substance, which feels very interesting.
 Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, connected to elaborate sewage systems.
 In the houses of the Greek island of Crete and the city of St. Torin Minos, the remains of sewage systems have been found.
 Toilets were also used in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In Roman civilization, toilets were often part of public baths, which were mixed-gender.
 You call someone who is far away, and you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and almost immediately reflects it back.
 Satellites are launched into space by rockets. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts some light and vision.
 To get a satellite or a telescope into space, you need a giant rocket that is more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in unimaginable ways. The greatest contribution of the wheel to us is that it has made our transportation more convenient.
 It is what made the train, the car, and many other forms of transportation possible.
 Below them are more medium-sized cat-like animals, which eat medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes.
 In the end, many small carnivores, including pet cats, eat a much larger variety of small prey, including insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 Their secret to success is the lek concept, where each cat is responsible for a particular task, preventing them from competing with other cats.
 Lions are the most social of the cat family, living in large groups called prides.
 A pride consists of one to three adult males, related to each other, and up to thirty females and cubs.
 As sisters and daughters within a family, females are usually close to each other.
 The behavior of lion prides is very similar to that of wolf or dog packs, and the behavior of these animals is strikingly similar to that of lions (but not other large cats) and is also very deadly to their prey.
 Tigers are all-round athletes, they can climb (although not very well), swim, jump and pull with a force five times that of a human strongman.
 Tigers, lions, leopards, and jaguars are all in the same family (the cat family). These four big cats are the only cats that roar.
 The roar of a tiger is not as deep as that of a lion, but more like a grumbling sentence.
 Cheetahs like to eat small animals. If conditions allow, they will catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds. The prey of cheetahs is almost always much smaller than themselves.
 Scientists believe that the jaguar uses its sense of smell and its ability to sniff out the scent of prey on the ground to track and hunt its prey.
 They have excellent night vision and can see very well in the dark. They are also very stealthy. The leopard's hunting method is to blend in with the surroundings and then pounce on its prey.
 When a small group of organisms (a small population) is separated from their original main population (e.g. they cross a mountain range or river, or they end up on a new island where they cannot easily return) they often find themselves in a different environment.
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new populations will need different traits or adaptations to be a strong competitor, rather than what they needed before.
 The original population has not changed at all, and it still needs to adapt to the environment as before.
 Over time, new populations began to adapt to their new environment, and they began to look more and more different from the other populations.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will eventually look so different that they cannot be considered the same species.
 We call this process “speciation,” the formation of new species. Speciation is a necessary outcome of evolution, and it is a very important part of evolution.
 Plants can produce oxygen for humans to breathe and absorb carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants get their nutrients from sunlight through photosynthesis. They also provide shade.
 We build houses with plants. We make clothes with plants. Most of the food we eat comes from plants. Without plants, animals can't survive.
 The Qilin was the top predator of that era, and it feared nothing except its own kind.
 Its long lower jaw is lined with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, and its upper jaw has a row of them as well. This means that anything that comes into contact with it has no escape.
 Its tongue may have been forked, but we are not sure. Its diet included sea turtles, large fish, other plesiosaurs, and even people.
 It would attack anything that entered the water; even a giant dinosaur like a tyrannosaur would not be a match for it.
 Although most of the foods the Romans ate are familiar to us, they did have some strange or unusual banquet dishes, including wild boar, peacock, snails, and a rodent called the porcupine.
 Another difference is that the poor and women sit on chairs to eat, while the rich prefer to have a banquet and eat while lying down.
 Foods that were introduced to Europe from the Americas or Asia several centuries later could not have been present in the diet of the ancient Romans.
 For example, they had no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, and cocoa, and no Roman ever ate chicken.
 The Babylonians built a temple for each of their gods, which they considered to be the god's home.
 People would offer sacrifices to the gods, and priests would satisfy the gods' needs through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple has an open courtyard, and an inner sanctum that only the priests can enter.
 Some special towers are pyramidal in shape, and are called pyramid temples, built as part of a temple complex.
 The top of the tower is a special holy place of God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, a house is not so important.
 The Hebrew family spent most of their time outdoors.
 Women cook in the yard; the shops are open counters facing the street. They build their houses with stone.
 Canaan had no great forests, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland is sparsely populated. According to the Norse Saga of Eric the Red, who was banished from Iceland for murder, he sailed west and discovered land, which he named Greenland.
 But whether he found it or not, the Eskimos were already living there.
 Although they are all part of the Scandinavian region, Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland have many differences in their people, kings, customs and history.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think the back of the Declaration of Independence has a treasure map on it.
 However, this is not the case. Although the back of the document contains some writing, it is not a treasure map.
 The back of the Declaration of Independence reads, “Original Declaration of Independence dated 4th July 1776.” The words are written upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although no one knows who the author was, the large parchment document (29¾ inches by 24½ inches) was said to have been rolled up and stored when it was first written.
 Thus, it is likely that the symbol was added as a label.
 The Normandy landings and the subsequent fighting liberated northern France, but the south remained unliberated.
 It was ruled by the “Vichy” French, who in 1940 made a peace agreement with the Germans and cooperated with them instead of resisting the invaders.
 On August 15, 1940, Allied forces invaded southern France, an operation known as Operation Dragoon.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces liberated southern France and turned their attention to Germany.
 Civilization is a single culture shared by a community of people who live together and work together.
 The word "civilization" comes from the Latin "civilis" ("of the citizen"), which in turn comes from "civis" ("citizen") and "civitas" ("city" or "state"), which in some ways define the scale of society.
 The city-state is the ancestor of the nation. Civilized culture means the transmission of knowledge from generation to generation, the footprints of culture remain, and culture can be fairly transmitted.
 Minority cultures often disappear without a trace, and are not considered civilized.
 During the War of Independence, the thirteen states initially formed a weak central government (Congress was its only component) under the Articles of Confederation.
 Congress has no power to tax, and since there is no national executive or judicial branch, Congress can only rely on state governments to enforce all laws, which often do not cooperate.
 It also has no power to overturn state tax laws and tariffs.
 These amendments must be ratified by all states, and the states are notoriously reluctant to ratify anything that the central government proposes, so that state representatives often fail to show up.
 The Italian national football team and the German national football team are the second most successful teams in the world, winning the World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby union, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and Formula One racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the north, where Italians compete in international competitions and the Olympic Games.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the world's seventh-largest island nation!
 Because of the many islands of Japan, Japan is often called an "archipelago" from a geological point of view.
 Western knowledge of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors passing by named the island “Formosa” (Ilha Formosa), meaning beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in the southwestern part of Taiwan, and began to change the indigenous people's food production methods and hired Chinese workers to work in its rice and sugar cane plantations.
 In 1683, the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) took control of western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan, and in 1885, the Qing Empire declared Taiwan a province.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, ceding Taiwan's sovereignty to Japan, which ruled Taiwan until 1945.
 The ancient city of Machu Picchu is composed of three main buildings: the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Three Windows.
 In order to better understand the original appearance of the building group, most of the buildings on the edge of the building group have been rebuilt.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common still image format in the world is 35mm format, which was the dominant film size at the end of the film era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio is used in digital camera image sensors.
 The actual size of the 35 mm format is 36 mm wide and 24 mm high, which is a bit confusing.
 Therefore, the aspect ratio of this format (divided by 12 to get the simplest integer ratio) is 3:2.
 Many common formats (such as the APS format series) have the same or a very similar aspect ratio.
 The often-abused and mocked rule of thirds is a simple guide when creating motion, and it keeps the image orderly.
 It states that the most effective position for the subject is the intersection of the lines that divide the image vertically and horizontally into three parts (see example).
 During this period in European history, the already wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was closely monitored.
 Although the languages and customs of the European countries differ, for more than a thousand years, Christianity has united them.
 From the king to the commoner, it permeates the power of the ten directions and influences every person.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and church-based funds are set up to do just that.
 The centralized power of the church in Rome had existed for over a thousand years, and the concentration of power and money had led many to question whether they were following the tenets of their faith.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began to blockade Germany by sea.
 They cut off vital military and civilian supplies. The strategy proved effective, even though the blockade violated international law, which had been established over the past two centuries and was generally accepted by all.
 Britain laid mines in international waters to prevent any ship from entering the entire area, even threatening neutral ships.
 Because the response to this strategy has been limited, Germany expects a similar response to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing attitude among most citizens was pacifist and separatist.
 After witnessing the devastation of World War I, countries were eager to avoid a repeat.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States and took a job with the Edison Company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his former employer, to Thomas Edison.
 Different periods in China's history have their own characteristics; each period or each family that ruled China was a distinctive dynasty.
 Similarly, the period of small states and instability during the succession of dynasties is well known, most notably the 60-year period of the Three Kingdoms, which was between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During these turbulent times, various warlords fought for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in the struggle for control of the lavish palaces of the capital, Chang'an.
 There are also many social and political influences, such as the use of units of measurement, the transition from autocracy to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the nation belongs to the people rather than to a single ruler.
 In addition, after the revolution, the civil service was open to all men, which gave the most ambitious and successful men a chance to rise.
 The same goes for the military, because the rank of a soldier is no longer based on the hierarchy, but on merit.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working classes in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was interested in things beyond this world. He used to go to a cave on Mount Hira, called Cave of Hira, to meditate.
 The cave itself, not only survived the test of time, but also brought a very vivid image of Muhammad's spiritual intentions.
 The cave is located on the top of a mountain in the north of Mecca, completely isolated from the outside world.
 In fact, even if you know it exists, it is not easy to find. Once you enter the cave, you are completely cut off from the world.
 Except for the clear blue sky and the surrounding mountains, nothing can be seen. In the cave, almost nothing can be seen or heard from the outside.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the Ancient World still standing.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is an Egyptian masterpiece from the third millennium B.C. and one of the largest pyramids built in honour of a deceased pharaoh.
 The Giza plateau in Egypt (the site of the "Giza Pyramids") includes several pyramids (the largest of which is the Great Pyramid), several smaller tombs, several temples, and the Great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built to commemorate Pharaoh Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to commemorate Khufu's wife and family members.
 The “up bow” symbol looks like the letter V, and the “down bow” symbol looks like a nail or a square with a missing bottom edge.
 Upward means starting from the top of the bow, downward means starting from the bowstring.
 The upper bow usually makes a softer sound, while the lower bow makes a stronger, more determined sound.
 Please make your own marks with a pencil, but remember that the notes you print out are musical, so they should usually be respected.
 On 6 October 1789, the frightened King Louis XVI, his Queen Marie Antoinette and their two children (11-year-old Marie Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis Charles), and the King's sister, the Princesse de Lamballe, were taken from Versailles by a mob of women and brought back to Paris.
 They rode back to Paris in a carriage, and a crowd surrounded them, shouting and threatening the king and queen.
 The mob forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 In front of the terrified queen, a rioter brandished the head of a royal guard who had been killed at the palace.
 The war expenditures of the U.S. imperialists in conquering the Philippines were paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial regime to cover most of the expenses, and interest on bonds issued in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banks.
 Of course, the high profits gained by the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people are the basic gains of US imperialism.
 To understand the Knights Templar, one must understand the background that led to the formation of the Knights Templar.
 The period of time in which the events occurred is usually called the High Middle Ages, the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries (1000-1300 CE).
 The Middle Ages are divided into the Early Middle Ages and the High Middle Ages, and the Late Middle Ages are conventionally considered to end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that covers many ideas in practice, including technological determinism, technological inevitability, and a strict definition—that human destiny is driven by the underlying logic of scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 Most explanations of technological determinism include both of these general ideas: first, that technological development is largely independent of cultural or political influences, and second, that technology has an inherent “influence” on society that is not subject to social conditions.
 For example, one might say that cars will necessarily promote the development of roads.
 However, building a national road network for only a few cars is not economically viable, so a new production method was invented to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 The high number of cars on the road also leads to a higher rate of road traffic accidents, which in turn drives the development of new medical technologies for repairing injuries.
 Romanticism has a strong cultural determinism color. This comes from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the romantic context, geography shapes the individual, and over time, geographically-related customs and cultures emerge that are far more compatible with the place than any arbitrary imposition of law.
 Just as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the contemporary world, Constantinople is considered to be the fashion capital of the European Middle Ages.
 Its reputation as a center of luxury goods began around 400 CE and lasted until around 1100 CE.
 Its status declined in the twelfth century, mainly because the Crusaders brought back goods such as silk and spices that were more valuable than those available in Byzantine markets.
 It was at this time that the title of fashion capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 Gothic style reached its peak between the 10th and 11th centuries and the 14th century.
 Initially, the robe was deeply influenced by Eastern Byzantine culture.
 However, because of the slow pace of cultural exchange, Western fashion may be 25 to 30 years behind.
 As the Middle Ages drew to a close, Western Europeans developed their own styles. One of the biggest advances was the use of buttons to fasten clothing, which came about after the Crusades.
 Self-sufficiency farming is the practice of farming only enough food to feed the farmer and his family.
 Self-sufficient agriculture is a simple and often organic system that uses local seeds stored in the ecosystem and combines them with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yields.
 Historically, most farmers have been self-sufficient, and this is still the case in many developing countries.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded individuals who feel that they are being ignored by mainstream society, and they foster a sense of belonging among their members.
 Given the diversity of age, race, class, location, and/or gender among members, subcultures may vary.
 What makes a subculture distinctive may be a combination of language, aesthetics, religion, politics, gender, geography, or many factors.
 Members of subcultures often use symbolic elements of their subculture to signal their membership, including fashion, mannerisms, and slang.
 One of the most common ways to illustrate the importance of socialization is to use the case of a few unfortunate children who, because of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate mistreatment, have not been socialized by adults in their development.
 Such children are called "feral children", meaning wild children. Some feral children are confined by people (usually their own parents); in some cases, the child is abandoned because the parents refuse to accept the child's severe mental or physical disabilities.
 Before being abandoned or running away, feral children may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma.
 Others are said to have been raised by animals; some live alone in the wild.
 If a wolf child is raised entirely by non-human animals, its behavior (within the limits of its physical condition) will be very similar to that of the animal, for example, it will show fear or indifference towards humans.
 While project-based learning should make learning easier and more fun, the framework-based approach goes even further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but a means of helping people who are just learning to use a new computer program or start a new project.
 Tutoring can be done online or in person, in other words, a teacher is a form of tutoring, like the wizard in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual support is embedded in the software to question, prompt and explain those procedures that may be difficult for students to handle on their own.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, including neglect, abuse, and even extortion.
 No child should grow up in an environment without nurturing, without love, without education, but that is what happens.
 We believe the foster system is a safe haven for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable medical care.
 The foster system should provide all the necessities that the child's original family lacked.
 The Internet combines the elements of mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The Internet's distinctive characteristics add an extra dimension to its uses and affordances.
 For example, “learning” and “socializing” were identified as important motivations for using the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 In studying audience response to Web sites, Eimers and McDowell (1998) also identified “personal involvement” and “continuing relationship” as new motivational factors.
 The use of video has led to major discoveries in the interpretation of micro-expressions (facial movements lasting a few milliseconds).
 Specifically, it is said that you can tell if someone is lying by correctly reading their micro-expressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his essay “The President’s Speech,” points out that people with brain damage who cannot understand language can still accurately judge whether a speaker is being sincere.
 He even suggested that this ability to understand human behavior may be a common trait among animals, such as dogs.
 Twentieth-century research has shown that genetic variation comes in two kinds of pools: overt and covert.
 Mutations add new genetic variation, while selection removes variation from the gene pool by expressing it.
 Because of the separation and recombination, variation moves back and forth between the two pools in each generation.
 On the tropical savannah, primates have a digestive system similar to humans, and the available plant resources are not sufficient to meet their amino acid requirements.
 Moreover, failure to do so can have serious consequences: growth retardation, malnutrition, and ultimately death.
 The easiest plant-based resources to obtain would be the leaves and proteins in legumes, but primates like us have a hard time digesting these proteins unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal foods (ants, termites, eggs) are not only easy to digest, but also provide a lot of protein, which contains all the necessary amino acids.
 In light of the above, if our ancestors solved the “protein problem” in a way similar to that used by the black apes of the tropical grasslands today, we should not be surprised.
 Interrupted sleep is a process in which a person intentionally wakes up during normal sleep and falls asleep again within a short time (10-60 minutes).
 This is easy to do by using a relatively quiet alarm clock so that you wake up without being fully awake.
 If you find yourself resetting your alarm clock while you're asleep, you can put the clock on the other side of the room to force yourself out of bed.
 Other biological-based choices include drinking large amounts of liquid before bed (especially water or tea, which are known to have diuretic effects) and forcing oneself to get up to urinate.
 The degree of inner peace of a person is the opposite of the degree of tension in his body and mind.
 The less stress, the more vitality. Everyone has the potential to find absolute calm and satisfaction.
 Everyone can reach enlightenment, and the only thing that prevents us from doing so is our own tension and negative emotions.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been expanded through the universal love of Mahayana Buddhism and the many techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It includes the methods of kundalini yoga, meditation, and universal love.
 In Kundalini Yoga, Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The core activity of Tibetan meditation is Tummo. Through the visualization of different deities, purifying energy channels, and activating acupoints, one can reach the state of enlightenment.
 Germany was the common enemy of all the countries in World War II, which promoted cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States. As the war ended, systemic, procedural and cultural conflicts caused the two countries to part ways.
 Two years after the war ended, former allies became enemies, and the Cold War began.
 The war lasted 40 years, with proxy armies fighting on many battlefields from Africa to Asia, including Afghanistan and Cuba.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish front had been broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize the army along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans were almost immediately abandoned, and after the invasion of eastern Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties, more than 800,000 Soviet Red Army troops entered the country and took up positions in Belarus and Ukraine.
 To date, shipping is the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across oceans.
 Traditionally, the Navy's mission is to ensure that the nation maintains the ability to transport people and goods, while disrupting the enemy's ability to transport people and goods.
 One of the most notable modern examples is the North Atlantic campaign of World War II. The Americans tried to cross the Atlantic to help the British.
 Meanwhile, the German Navy, with its U-boats as its main force, tried to intercept the convoy.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would probably have conquered Britain as well as the rest of Europe.
 Goats appear to have been domesticated for the first time in the Zagros Mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to domesticate them, eating and using their milk, meat, fur, and skin.
 The family sheep are usually herded in groups on the mountains or other pastures, usually by shepherds (mostly children or adolescents), similar to the more widely known shepherds. These methods of herding are still in use today.
 Britain had built a highway in the 16th century.
 Although the mara rail cars were only made of parallel wooden planks, for the time, these cars made it possible for the horses to run faster and pull more.
 Early on, railroad ties were used to secure the rails, but people gradually realized that if they put iron plates on the rails, the rails would be more stable and effective.
 This became the general practice, but the iron plates made the wooden wheels of the chariots wear out more quickly.
 Eventually, the wooden wheel was replaced by the iron wheel. In 1767, the first all-iron track was introduced.
 The first known means of transportation was walking. 200 million years ago, with the appearance of Homo erectus, humans began to walk upright.
 Their ancestors, the southern apes, did not have the habit of walking upright.
 The earliest evidence of bipedalism in humans comes from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago in southern apes, although Sahelanthropus tchadensis may have walked on two legs as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living more sustainably, join the environmental movement, and even become environmental activists, reducing the future disaster to some extent.
 In many cases, this is similar to symptomatic treatment. But if we want a permanent solution, we should find the root of the problem and get rid of it completely.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot due to human scientific and technological progress, and the population explosion and human luxurious lifestyle have made the problem more serious.
 The handwritten draft, signed by Speaker John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was approved by the Continental Congress on July 4 and sent to John Dunlap's printing shop in Philadelphia for publication.
 They printed 150 to 200 copies overnight, the now-famous "Dunlap broadsides."
 On July 8, John Nixon read the document aloud for the first time in the Independence Hall courtyard.
 One of these, dated 6 July, was sent to George Washington, who read it to his army in New York on 9 July. A copy reached London on 10 August.
 The 25 remaining Dunlap broadsides are the earliest surviving versions of the document, as the handwritten originals have not survived.
 Many paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and evolved into the birds we know today.
 Many people think they are not dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But birds still have many places similar to dinosaurs.
 They have scales and claws, lay eggs, and walk on two legs like a tyrannosaur.
 Today, almost all computers in use are based on processing information in binary code.
 Binary numbers can only take on one of two values, either 0 or 1, and are called binary digits, or "bits" in computer science.
 Internal poisoning may not immediately manifest itself, and symptoms such as vomiting are common, so it cannot be diagnosed immediately.
 The most powerful indication of ingestion of a poisonous substance is a container that has been opened at the scene and contains a drug or household toxic chemical.
 Check the label on the poison for specific first aid instructions.
 Entomologists use the term "bug" to refer to this group of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity of people with the botfly, a parasitic insect that is very well adapted to infest humans.
 Both the parasitic wasp and the parasitic fly are nesting insects, adapted to live in the nests or dwellings of their hosts.
 There are approximately 400,000 multiple sclerosis (MS) cases in the United States, making it the leading neurological disease of young and middle-aged adults.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system (composed of the brain, spinal cord, and optic nerves).
 Research has found that women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis (MS).
 A couple may decide not to have children for their own benefit, or for the benefit of their children.
 These couples may have a plan for their children.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents terminate their parental rights, so that another couple can adopt the child.
 The main purpose of science is to find out how the world works, and in fact, this method can guide most scientific research.
 An experiment is a test to eliminate one or more possible hypotheses, but there are other ways to guide scientific research. Asking questions and observing can also be used.
 Naturalists and philosophers were interested in the classical texts, especially the Latin version of the Bible.
 Aristotle's views on all scientific fields, including psychology, were accepted.
 As Greek knowledge declined, the West became detached from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many of the physiological and behavioral rhythms observed by researchers are largely dependent on endogenous cycles generated by the biological clock and its presence.
 Periodic rhythms are not just a simple response to external periodic signals. Such rhythms are recorded in most organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 The biological clock is a self-sustaining oscillator that keeps time for a period of time, even without external cues.
 The experiments of Hershey and Chase showed that DNA was a major indicator of heredity.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages or viruses to insert their own DNA into bacteria.
 They did two experiments, one to label the bacteriophage DNA with radioactive phosphorus and one to label the bacteriophage proteins with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a wide variety of effects, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected gene, and whether the cell is a reproductive cell.
 Only mutations in reproductive cells are passed on to children, while mutations in other cells lead to cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism attracts visitors interested in natural areas, who come to see natural scenery, including wildlife.
 Activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, park tours and ecosystem studies.
 For example, visiting, photographing and learning about the orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people drive out of the small town to go to work, and the places where they pass by are the places where they leave from.
 In this dynamic traffic flow, everyone is connected to and supports the car-based transportation system in some way.
 Now, science shows that this massive carbon economy can no longer sustain the biosphere that has supported human evolution for the past 200,000 years.
 Everyone is a member of society, and everyone uses the transportation system. And almost everyone has complaints about the transportation system.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear complaints about water quality or bridge collapses of this magnitude.
 Why do transport systems cause so much complaint? Why do they break down every day? Are transport engineers incompetent, or is there a more fundamental reason?
 Traffic flow studies are concerned with the movement of drivers and vehicles between two points and their interactions with each other.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study traffic flow because it is impossible to predict the behavior of drivers with 100 percent certainty.
 Fortunately, the driver's behavior is often within a reasonable consistency range; therefore, the traffic flow often has a certain reasonable consistency, which can be roughly expressed by mathematical methods.
 To better express traffic flow, a relationship was established between the following three main characteristics: (1) flow, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships help with the planning, design and operation of the road infrastructure.
 Insects were the first animals to fly in the air. The ability to fly made them more difficult to catch and more effective at finding food and mates.
 Most insects have an advantage in that they can fold their wings back along their bodies.
 This gives them more small surface area to hide from predators.
 Nowadays, the only insects that cannot fold their wings backward are dragonflies and damselflies.
 Several thousand years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system revolves around the sun.
 Some people think he is right, but many others disagree; they think the solar system revolves around the Earth, and the Sun, too (and even other stars).
 This seems reasonable, because the Earth doesn't feel itself moving, does it?
 The Amazon is the second longest river in the world, and the largest by volume. It is more than eight times the size of the next largest river.
 The Amazon River is also the widest river in the world, with some sections as wide as 6 miles.
 The Amazon River accounts for 20% of all riverine discharge to the oceans.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers (3,980 mi) long. The river's water comes from thousands of smaller tributaries.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the great size and sophisticated construction techniques of the Giza pyramids were never surpassed.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom marveled at the monuments of their predecessors, which were more than a thousand years old.
 The population of Vatican City is about 800 people. It is the smallest independent state in the world and the least populated country.
 The Vatican City uses Italian in its laws, statutes and official communications.
 Italian is also the language of most people working in the country, and Latin is used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican City are Roman Catholics.
 People have known about the basic chemical elements gold, silver, copper, and so on since ancient times, because these elements can be found in nature in their natural forms and are relatively easy to extract using primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle proposed a theory that all things are made up of one or more of the four elements of earth, water, air, and fire.
 This is more like the four states of matter (in no particular order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma, but he also proposed a theory that they would transform into new matter, making up the things we see.
 Alloys are basically made up of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are many elements on the periodic table.
 Calcium, potassium, and so on are metals, and silver and gold are metals, of course.
 There are also alloys containing small amounts of non-metallic elements (such as carbon).
 Everything in the universe is made of matter, and all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so small that the period at the end of this sentence could contain millions of atoms.
 So, when the pencil was invented, it became a favorite of many people.
 Unfortunately, with the advent of new writing methods, the pencil's status has been lowered and its use has become less frequent.
 People now write on computer screens, and never have to touch a pen.
 One can only guess what the fate of the keyboard will be when the new products appear.
 The principle of fission bombs is as follows: It takes energy to bring a nucleus and many protons and neutrons together.
 It's a bit like pushing a heavy little cart up a hill, and then splitting the nucleus again, and releasing some energy.
 Some atoms contain unstable nuclei, which means that they are likely to split under little or no stimulation.
 The surface of the Moon is made of rocks and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick near the surface and about 100 km thick at the bottom.
 The dark side is thinner, the highlands are thicker.
 Because the crust is thinner, the near side may have more dark material, and lava is more likely to rise to the surface.
 The core of the content theory of motivation is to find factors that are recognized or generate interest.
 These theories suggest that as people mature to a certain degree into adulthood, certain needs and/or desires are internalized.
 These theories study why some people want to do what they do, and what in their environment makes them do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 Generally, when managers start leading former colleagues, two behaviors emerge. One is that they try to maintain a “close relationship” with team members.
 This type of manager has a hard time making unpopular decisions and has difficulty enforcing discipline, evaluating performance, assigning responsibilities, and holding people accountable.
 In another extreme, this person becomes a different individual from before, feeling that he/she must change everything the team does and take credit for the results.
 After all, leaders are ultimately responsible for the success or failure of their teams.
 This behavior often leads to disagreements between leaders and other team members.
 Virtual teams need to maintain the same quality standards as traditional teams, but with subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as the point of contact for their corresponding in-person team.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members because their teams may schedule meetings for different time zones, which local management may not understand.
 The real “invisible team” (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The “invisible team” is the management team to which each member reports. It sets standards for all members.
 Why would an organization spend so much time building a learning organization? One of the goals of putting the concept of organizational learning into practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively utilized among the functional departments of an organization, creativity and innovation will occur.
 Therefore, an organization in the process of overcoming obstacles together often leads to new innovative processes to meet customer needs.
 Before an organization can innovate, leaders must create a culture of innovation, sharing knowledge and learning.
 Angels (2006) explains the continuous improvement approach as a way to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for the theoretical methods of cognitive research. Therefore, it narrows the scope of research and makes research more accurate.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior can support researchers in their studies.
 We have known for a long time that different types of brain damage, injury, disease, and tumors can affect behavior and cause changes in certain mental functions.
 The advent of new technologies has allowed us to see and study the structure and workings of the brain in ways that were never possible before.
 This provides us with a wealth of information and material to build a simulation model, which helps us understand the process of brain functioning.
 Artificial intelligence has a strong science-fiction flavor, but it is actually a very important branch of computer science, which studies the behavior, learning and intelligence of machines.
 Artificial intelligence (AI) research involves building machines that automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples include control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnostics and customer issues, and handwriting recognition, speech and facial functionality.
 All of these became independent disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to real-life problems.
 Artificial intelligence systems are now commonly used in economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, and some home computers and video game software applications have built-in artificial intelligence systems.
 Field trips are an important part of any educational activity. Usually, teachers are happy to take students to places that are not accessible by public transport.
 Virtual field trips are high-tech solutions. Students can view museum artifacts in the classroom, visit an aquarium, or view beautiful artwork.
 Sharing the field trip virtually is also a good way to review the trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a website each year about their trip to the state capital. The website is redesigned each year, but the old versions are kept online as scrapbooks.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills. Although students often begin blogging with poor grammar and spelling, the presence of readers usually improves their writing.
 Students are often the most critical readers, so bloggers begin to work hard to improve their writing skills to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also “forces students to be more observant of the world around them.” By satisfying the audience’s interest, students are encouraged to become smart and interesting.
 Blogging is a tool that can foster collaboration and encourage students to extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 "Blogs can be used to help students become better at analyzing and reasoning; by actively responding to web materials, students can find their own position in the context of others' writings and can develop their own opinions on specific issues" (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the capital of Canada, a charming city with a bilingual system, and is highlighted by a series of art galleries and museums that showcase Canada's past and present.
 Further south is Niagara Falls, and to the north is the Muskoka River and the unspoiled natural beauty on the other side.
 All these things make Ontario the typical image of Canada that foreigners think of.
 Further north, the vast expanses are sparsely populated, and some areas are deserted.
 One striking population comparison: the number of African Americans living in the United States is greater than the number of Canadian citizens.
 The East African islands are located off the east coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is the largest island in the world, and for wildlife, it is still a continent of its own.
 The smaller islands are mostly independent or French territories, known for their luxurious beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the land, and this doctrine is prevalent in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 Europe's influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorers Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape of Good Hope route from Europe to India.
 It borders the Sahel region to the north and the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west.
 Female: It is recommended that all female visitors, regardless of their actual marital status, state that they are married.
 Wearing a ring can help, too (but don't wear a ring that looks too expensive.
 Women should be aware that cultural differences may lead to what they perceive as harassment; and that being followed, grabbed, etc. is not uncommon.
 When you reject a man, be firm and don't be afraid to stand up for yourself (regardless of cultural differences, be firm and say no!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century, and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merenid.
 The Portuguese destroyed the city and rebuilt it, naming it Casa Branca, until the earthquake of 1755 left it abandoned.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya. Spanish merchants established a trading base here and named it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring shopping destinations in Morocco.
 In the old city of Medina, shops selling Moroccan traditional goods such as tagines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and various trinkets are everywhere, but these shops are aimed at tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, located on the eastern edge of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried much of the town's streets, especially in the centre.
 Although Goma is relatively safe, travel to any destination outside of Goma should be researched in advance to determine whether the ongoing fighting in North Kivu has abated.
 The city is also the base for climbing Mount Nyiragongo and for the cheapest gorilla tracking in Africa.
 You can take a boda-boda (motorcycle taxi) to tour Goma. The normal (local) price for a short ride is 500 Congolese francs.
 Because it is relatively remote, "Tinbakutu" is used to refer to a distant foreign country.
 Today, although Tinbuktu is a tourist destination and has an airport, it is a poor town.
 In 1990, it was listed as a World Heritage Site in Danger due to the threat of desertification.
 This was an important stop for Henry Louis Gates on the PBS special, The African Americans: Many Rivers to Cross.
 The city is a stark contrast to the rest of the country, as it is more Arabic in style than African.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in northeastern South Africa, bordering Mozambique to the east and Zimbabwe to the north.
 The park covers 19,500 square kilometers and is divided into 14 different ecological zones to support different wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's major tourist attractions and is considered to be the flagship of the South African National Parks (SANParks) system.
 Like all South African national parks, the park charges an entrance fee and a conservation fee every day.
 A Wild Card also has many advantages. With this card, you can enter some parks or all national parks in South Africa.
 Hong Kong Island is the epitome of Hong Kong and the focal point for many visitors.
 The many buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline are like a flashing bar chart, especially when reflected in the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 If you want to see the best views of Hong Kong, you can leave the island and head to the opposite side of the bay to Kowloon.
 Most of the urban development on Hong Kong Island is concentrated on reclaimed land on the north shore.
 This is where the British colonizers occupied the land, so if you want to find evidence of the colonial history of this territory, this is a good starting point.
 The Sundarbans is the world’s largest mangrove forest, stretching 80 kilometres (50 miles) from the coast into Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans has been declared a World Heritage Site by UNESCO. The part of the forest in India is called Sundarbans National Park.
 But these forests are not just mangrove swamps; they also contain the remnants of some of the great forests that once covered the Ganges plain.
 Sønderjylland has an area of 3,850 km2, of which about one third is water/marshland.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary, and is home to an estimated 400 Royal Bengal tigers and about 30,000 deer.
 Buses run all day from the city centre interchange (across the river), but most buses, especially those to the east and Jaka/Bumthang, run between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Given the frequent fullness of the shuttle buses, it is recommended to purchase tickets several days in advance.
 Most areas are served by comfortable and sturdy Japanese Coaster buses.
 To get to nearby places such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200), shared taxis are a convenient and comfortable way to go.
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River, connecting Oiapoque, Brazil, with Saint-Georges, French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 meters high, the bridge is 378 meters long, and there are two 3.50-meter-wide lanes.
 The bridge has a vertical clearance of 15 meters. The project was completed in August 2011, but it was not opened until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, when the Brazilian customs checkpoint is also expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní are the most important indigenous group in the eastern part of Paraguay, living a semi-nomadic hunter-gatherer lifestyle, with some agricultural activities.
 The Chaco region was home to other indigenous tribes such as the Guaycuru and Payagua, who lived off hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay was known as the “Great Indian Province” in the 16th century, the result of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and the indigenous groups that inhabited the region.
 The Spanish began a three-century-long period of colonization.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has sought to preserve many of the city's native characteristics and features.
 Argentina is famous for having the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at the polo field in Las Cañitas.
 On other days of the year, smaller tournaments and competitions are also held here.
 For news of the tournament and how to buy tickets for the polo matches, please see the Argentine Polo Association website.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equal in value to the British pound.
 Currency can be exchanged at the island's only bank, located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 The pound is generally accepted everywhere on the island, and credit cards and US dollars are often accepted in Stanley.
 Credit cards may not be accepted on the outer islands, but British and American currency is accepted; please check with the owner in advance to confirm the acceptable method of payment.
 It is almost impossible to exchange Falkland Islands currency outside the islands, so you should exchange it before you leave.
 Montevideo is located south of the equator, so during the winter in the northern hemisphere, it is summer there.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropical zone; in the summer months, temperatures often exceed 30°C.
 Winters may feel colder than they actually are: temperatures rarely drop below freezing, but when wind and humidity combine, it can feel colder than the thermometer says.
 There is no specific “rainy season” and “dry season” here: the annual rainfall is roughly the same.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to humans, wild animals are still wild animals, and we should not feed or disturb them.
 Park officials say that you should keep at least 100 yards away from bears and wolves, and 25 yards away from all other wildlife!
 No matter how docile they may appear, bison, moose, elk, bears, and almost all large animals are capable of attacking humans.
 Each year, dozens of visitors are injured by not keeping a proper distance. These animals are large, wild, and potentially dangerous, so please give them some space.
 In addition, bears and other wildlife are attracted by odors, so avoid carrying or cooking odorous foods and keep campsites clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The town is located on the island of Upolu, with a population of less than 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The Gulf had been the scene of a notorious naval confrontation in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the Gulf.
 Apart from a British cruiser, all the other ships sank, and nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 In the struggle for independence organized by the Mau movement, a peaceful meeting in the town resulted in the death of the paramount chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Auckland straddles two harbours, so there are plenty of beaches in the city. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The North Shore beaches (within the Northcote area) run along the Pacific Ocean from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 It's almost all beach, and swimming is safe, with most areas shaded by New Zealand Christmas trees.
 Tamaki Drive Beach is located on the Waitemata Harbour, just off Mission Bay and St Heliers, the upmarket suburbs of central Auckland.
 These beaches are sometimes crowded with holidaying families, and there are all sorts of shops along the shore. Swimming is safe.
 The main beer in the area is "Number One" beer. It is not complex, but it is very good and refreshing. Another local beer is called "Manta".
 You can buy a lot of French wine here, but New Zealand and Australian wines may be more travel-friendly.
 The local tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you are still worried, bottled water is readily available.
 The concept of “flat white” coffee is still relatively new to Australians. A small cup of black coffee is “espresso” and the cappuccino is piled high with cream (not foam) and tea is not served with milk.
 Hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards. The juice is expensive, but of good quality.
 There are many people visiting the Great Barrier Reef throughout the year and there are very few injuries sustained on the Great Barrier Reef as a result of any of the above activities.
 Nevertheless, you should follow the advice of the relevant authorities and observe all signs and warnings.
 Box jellyfish appear on the beaches and in the estuaries around 1770 town from October to April each year, and occasionally at other times.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans. Most sharks are afraid of humans and will swim away.
 The main habitat of the saltwater crocodile is not the ocean, but the mouths of rivers in the north of Rockhampton.
 Booking in advance can give travelers peace of mind that they will have a place to stay when they arrive.
 Although travel agencies may help you book camping and other forms of accommodation, they usually work with specific hotels.
 Travel agencies often offer packages that include breakfast, airport transfers, and even airline and hotel accommodation.
 If you need time to consider the price or to obtain other documents (such as a visa) for your destination, they can reserve the booking for you.
 If any changes are required or any requests are made, they should be made through the travel agent, not directly with the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the majority of attendees choose to camp on-site, and most attendees consider this to be an important part of the festival experience.
 If you want to see the show up close, you'll have to get there early and set up camp near the stage.
 Remember, although the main stage music may have ended, the rest of the festival may still be playing music until late into the night.
 Some music festivals have special camping areas for families with children.
 If you cross the North Sea in winter, you have to check the position of the cabins, because sailing on the ice can be very noisy for those who are most affected.
 St. Petersburg cruises include an in-city tour. Cruise passengers are eligible for a visa-free entry (please see the terms and conditions for details).
 Casinos are designed to keep customers spending as much time and money as possible. Casinos typically have no windows or clocks, and exits are often hard to find.
 They often provide special food, drinks, and entertainment to keep customers happy and keep them in the casino.
 Some venues provide free alcoholic beverages. However, alcohol impairs judgment and all good gamblers know the importance of staying sober.
 Anyone driving or crossing mountain passes in high latitudes should consider the possibility of encountering snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On snow-covered roads, friction is low, and you can't drive as fast as on a smooth asphalt road.
 In a blizzard, a short amount of time can produce enough snow to trap you.
 Snow, sleet, water droplets or ice on the windshield can also obstruct vision.
 On the other hand, snow and ice are common in many countries, and transportation is almost never interrupted.
 Hunting safaris are perhaps the most attractive tourist activity in Africa and are a highlight for many visitors.
 The word “safari” in common usage refers to a land-based journey to view the spectacular wildlife of Africa, especially in the tropical grasslands.
 Some animals (such as elephants and giraffes) often like to get close to cars, and standard equipment can make it easier to appreciate them.
 Lions, leopards and cheetahs are sometimes afraid of people, and you can see them better with binoculars.
 Hiking (also called bushwalking, backpacking, or trekking) is traveling on foot, usually for pleasure.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021. Some events will be held in other parts of Japan.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to have hosted two Summer Olympics, the first in 1964.
 If you booked a 2020 flight and accommodation before the announcement, you may be in a tricky situation.
 The cancellations vary, but as of the end of March, most of the cancellations due to the coronavirus did not extend beyond July 2020, the original date of the Olympics.
 Ticket prices for most events are expected to range from 2,500 yen to 130,000 yen, with the average price around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing damp clothes can help them dry. Even if you don't have an iron and ironing board, many hotels offer a laundry service.
 If you don't have an iron, or you don't like wearing ironed socks, you can try a hair dryer (if you have one).
 Be careful not to let the clothes get too hot (this can cause shrinkage, and in extreme cases, can burn the clothes).
 There are many ways to purify water, some more effective for specific contaminants.
 In some areas, one minute is enough, in others, several minutes are needed.
 The effectiveness of filters varies, and if you are concerned about this, you should consider buying bottled water from a reputable company.
 Travelers may encounter harmful animals that are not common in their home country.
 Pests can contaminate food, cause irritation, and in more serious cases, allergic reactions, spread toxins or infectious diseases.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can kill humans through violence, are not usually considered pests.
 Duty-free shopping is the opportunity to buy duty-free goods in a specific location.
 Travellers to countries/regions with high taxes on alcohol, tobacco and other products may save a lot of money by purchasing these items in these locations.
 The most challenging driving conditions on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway are between Point Marion and Fairmont, where the highway frequently passes through remote, isolated areas.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, you had better keep your wits about you: There are steep hills, narrow roads and sharp turns everywhere.
 The posted speed limit is significantly lower than before and after, typically 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h), and the importance of strictly adhering to the speed limit is emphasized.
 Oddly enough, though, the cell service here is much stronger than on many other routes, such as the Pennsylvania prairie.
 German pastries are great, but Bavarian pastries are even better, and are very similar to their neighbors to the south, Austria.
 Fruit snacks are common, and apples are used year-round for snacks, and cherries and apricots are available in the summer.
 Many German baked goods feature almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. Popular cakes are often paired with strong coffee.
 If you want something a little more filling, try a fruit jam bun, which is called a Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen in different parts of the country.
 Curry is a dish made with spices and herbs, and is usually served with meat or vegetables.
 Curry dishes can be both “dry” and “wet”, depending on how much water is used.
 In the northern parts of India and in the interior of Pakistan, curd is often used in curries; in the southern parts of India and in some other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is often used.
 Indonesia has 17,000 islands, so Indonesian cuisine is a catch-all term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines.
 But without further ado, this word usually refers to food that originates from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now, the island has a wide variety of Javanese cuisine, including many simple dishes, and the main spices used by Javanese people are peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese palm sugar) and various spices.
 The stirrups are suspended from the saddle on either side, to support the rider's feet.
 They provide better stability for the rider, but also have safety risks because the rider's feet can get caught.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but one foot is caught in the stirrup, the horse may drag him along as it runs. To minimize this risk, some precautions can be taken.
 First, most horseback riders wear boots with spurs, and the soles are smooth and quite narrow.
 Second, some saddles—especially English saddles—have safety catches that, if the rider falls backward, the girth strap will come off the saddle.
 Chile's premier mountaineering destination, the Cochamó Valley, has been called the Yosemite of South America, with its variety of granite walls and cliffs.
 From the mountain peaks there is a breathtaking view. Climbers from all over the world are constantly opening new routes on the steep walls that serve as climbing walls.
 Alpine skiing includes downhill skiing and snowboarding, which is a very popular sport in which a snowboard or ski board is attached to your feet and you slide down snow-covered terrain.
 Skiing is a major tourist activity for many ski enthusiasts, who are sometimes referred to as "ski bums", who plan to spend the entire holiday skiing at one location.
 The idea of skiing has been around for a long time—cave paintings of skiers date back to 5,000 B.C.!
 As a sport, downhill skiing can be traced back to at least the 17th century, and in 1861, the first recreational ski club was established in Australia.
 Skiing: This activity is also called backcountry skiing, ski touring or ski mountaineering.
 This activity is related to Alpine skiing or mountaineering, but usually does not involve these activities. These activities are done on steep terrain and require harder skis and boots.
 Think of a ski run as a hiking trail.
 In good conditions, you can go further than walking—but only in a few cases will you be able to match the speed of cross-country skiing on a flat track, without a heavy backpack.
 Europe is a continent of relatively small size but with many independent countries, and traveling across multiple countries usually means multiple visa applications and passport checks.
 However, in this respect, the Schengen area is a bit like a country.
 As long as you are staying in this area, you can usually cross the border directly without having to go through the passport checkpoint again.
 Likewise, with a Schengen visa, you do not have to apply for a visa to each Schengen member country separately, saving you time, money and hassle.
 There is no uniform definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax agencies define an antique as anything over 100 years old.
 The definition varies geographically, and the age limit may be shorter in North America than in Europe.
 Crafts may be defined as antiques, although they are much younger than mass-produced items of the same type.
 Reindeer husbandry is an important livelihood for the Sámi people, and the culture surrounding the industry is important to many who make their living in other ways.
 However, even if we take the traditional view, not all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry, and they lived by fishing, hunting and similar activities, and often kept reindeer as draft animals.
 Nowadays, many Saami people are involved in modern industries. Tourism is a major source of income in Sápmi, the Saami region.
 Although the term “Gypsy” is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about Roma.
 If the country you are visiting is subject to a travel warning, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult the advice of governments other than your own, but their advice is for their citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may face different treatment than Europeans or Arabs.
 Travel advisories can only provide a brief summary of the situation on the ground.
 Compared to the more detailed information provided elsewhere, the advice given here is often rough, general and overly simple.
 Extreme weather is a general term for any dangerous weather event that causes damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 Severe weather can occur anywhere in the world. Severe weather comes in many different types, depending on geography, terrain and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, hail, excessive rainfall, wildfires, and thunderstorms, tornadoes, waterspouts, and cyclones are all manifestations and effects of extreme weather.
 Regional and seasonal severe weather phenomena include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to be aware of the severe weather risks in their area, which may affect their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to go to a country that might be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 Search the Internet for “survivalist training” and you may find the address of a local company that offers such training.
 This course usually covers all the topics discussed here, and often goes into more depth with real-world examples.
 The course usually lasts 2-5 days and involves role-playing, first aid training, and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, but publications about survival in the battlefield are rare.
 Travelers planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad must bring valid documents when returning.
 As for whether they want to issue passports without a gender marker (X) or change documents to match the name and gender they want, governments’ willingness varies.
 The degree of recognition of these documents by foreign governments also varies widely.
 Since the events of September 11, 2001, security checks at airports have become more troublesome.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery have to reveal their privacy when they go through the scanner, and cannot guarantee their dignity.
 Offshore flow is the rapid return of waves from the beach to the sea, usually occurring at a reef or similar feature.
 The underwater topography causes the currents to concentrate in a few deep areas, where they can form strong currents flowing toward the deep water.
 Most deaths are caused by swimming upstream, against the current, which is exhausting.
 Once out of the turbulent water, it was not so difficult to swim back.
 Try to swim to a place where you won't get stuck again, or wait for rescue (depending on your skills and whether you've been spotted).
 The shock of returning home is faster, shorter, and more intense than the cultural shock.
 For travelers who are easily adaptable to new cultures, it can be difficult to re-adapt to their own culture.
 After living abroad for a while, you will find that you have adapted to the new culture and have dropped some of your home culture habits.
 When you first arrive, people may be very patient and understanding, because they know that travelers need time to adjust to a new country.
 People may not realize that travelers also need patience and understanding on the way back.
 For children, the sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most exciting activities in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark, and before the show starts you can see them standing there silently.
 You can hear the voices of tourists and street vendors here all the time, and the sounds and lights blend together, like a story being told.
 The backdrop is a lion-faced man, who is also the narrator of the long story.
 The scene is displayed on the pyramid, different pyramids are lit up.
 The South Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819. Several countries claim sovereignty over the islands, and the islands have the most bases, with sixteen bases in use in 2020.
 The islands are located 120 km north of the Antarctic Peninsula. The largest island is King George Island, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Others include Livinston Island and Deception Island. There, a still active volcano is submerged by floodwaters, providing a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth Land is located in the southern part of the peninsula, facing the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The peninsula's mountains merge here with the highlands, then re-form as the 360-kilometer-long Ellsworth Mountains, which are bisected by the Minnesota Glacier.
 In the north, or rather the Sentinel Range, the highest mountains of Antarctica are found, the highest being Mount Vinson, 4,892 m.
 In remote areas where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 Satellite phones generally cannot replace mobile phones because they can only be used outdoors where the satellite signal is strong.
 The service is often used for shipping, including yachts, and for exploration with remote data and voice needs.
 Your local phone service provider should be able to provide you with details about connecting to this service.
 For those planning how to spend their gap year, study abroad is becoming an increasingly popular option.
 This is particularly popular among high school graduates, who can take a year off before college without affecting their eligibility for financial aid.
 In many cases, taking a gap year abroad can actually improve your chances of getting into a good university back home.
 Usually, participation in these educational programs requires payment of tuition.
 Finland is a sailing paradise, with the nickname “the thousand lakes country”, and thousands of islands in its lakes and archipelago.
 In the archipelago and lakes, a boat is not necessary.
 The coastal islands and the largest lakes are large enough to accommodate any yacht, but smaller boats and even kayaks can provide a different experience.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight people.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand also have similar situations, but in other ways they are unique (for example, in the Netherlands, this figure is one to forty).
 Most typical Baltic cruises will spend a long time in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can have several full days to explore this historic city, then sleep on the boat at night.
 If you are only going to be on a ship, you do not need a separate visa (as of 2009).
 Some cruise lines advertise Berlin as a highlight, but as the map above shows, the city is not near the sea and the cruise price does not include the cost of visiting the city.
 Flying can be a terrifying experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if they have never flown before or have had a bad experience.
 This is not a bad thing: it is not unlike the fear and disgust that many people feel about other things.
 For some people, understanding how an aircraft works and how it flies can help to overcome fears about the unknown or uncontrollable.
 Courier companies can earn high wages for fast delivery of goods. Time is often of the essence for business documents, goods or spare parts for emergency repairs.
 On some routes, the big companies have their own planes, but for other routes and smaller companies, it's a problem.
 If they use air transport, it can take several days to unload and clear goods on some routes.
 The fastest way is to have it shipped as checked baggage. According to the airline's regulations, it is forbidden to carry unaccompanied baggage, and you will need to be present at that time.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay a lot of money to enjoy the privilege (or, better yet, have your company pay for it).
 However, this is not cheap: according to rough estimates, the price of a business class ticket could be 4 times that of an economy class ticket, and the price of a first class ticket could be 11 times that of an economy class ticket!
 Generally speaking, if you fly from A to B directly, there is no need to look for discounted business class or first class tickets.
 Airlines know that some core customers are willing to pay a premium for the privilege of fast, comfortable travel, so they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic, and has suffered from ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, the conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Moldavian Republic in the eastern part of the country, with its own government and currency, but without recognition by any United Nations member state.
 Despite the political failure, economic ties between the two regions of Moldova were re-established.
 The main religion in Moldova is Eastern Orthodoxy.
 Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, with a population of about 3.7 million, and it is Turkey's second largest port, after Istanbul, and a busy transportation hub.
 Once the ancient city of Smyrna, it is now a modern, developed and busy commercial centre surrounded by a vast bay and mountains.
 Between wide avenues, glass-fronted buildings and modern shopping malls, there are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets and ancient mosques and churches, but the city has a more Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey.
 In Haldarsvík you can enjoy the view of the island of Eysturoy in the distance. The village has a unique octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, some graves are topped with interesting marble carvings of doves.
 A half-hour stroll through this charming village is well worth it.
 To the north, you can easily reach the romantic and picturesque town of Sintra, the Lord Byron's famous Eden, and therefore well known to foreigners.
 The Scotturb 403 bus runs regularly to Sintra, stopping at Cabo da Roca.
 You can also visit the Basilica of Our Lady of Fatima in the north, which is the site of the famous apparitions of the Virgin Mary.
 Remember, you are actually visiting a massive mass grave site that has a profound meaning for a large group of people.
 Still, many men and women survived here and are still alive today; and many more of their relatives were killed there, or worked to death, Jews and non-Jews alike.
 Please give this place the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Do not joke about the Holocaust or the Nazis.
 Do not mark or graffiti on the buildings, so as not to damage the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the locals prefer to speak Catalan, and most people understand Catalan, while Spanish is understood by almost everyone.
 However, most signs are only in Catalan, as this is the first official language, as stipulated by law.
 However, public transportation and other facilities are also widely used in Spanish.
 The regular announcements in the metro are only in Catalan, but the automated system makes temporary announcements in several languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are notorious for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is often just an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to live in Paris is to behave as well as possible, like a person with “bien élevé” (good manners). This will make it much easier to participate in social activities.
 If you show a little basic courtesy, the Parisian rudeness will soon disappear.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is covered by dense forest of beech, fir and spruce, and is characterized by a mixture of mountain and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Because of the diversity of microclimates, soils and altitudes, the flora is very rich and is famous throughout the world.
 The area is also home to a variety of animals and birds.
 There you can see rare animals such as European brown bears, wolves, eagles, hawks, lynxes, wild cats and woodpeckers, as well as many more common species.
 Women must wear skirts when visiting the abbey, and the skirts must be knee-length and cover the shoulders.
 Most monasteries will provide a robe for women who are not prepared, but if you bring your own, especially if it is brightly colored, the monk at the door will give you a wry smile.
 Similarly, men must wear long pants to cover their knees.
 You can also borrow from the cloakroom at the entrance, but the clothes are not washed every time someone wears them, so these dresses may feel a little uncomfortable. All of them are the same size!
 The cuisine of Mallorca is similar to that of the Mediterranean region, based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork), and using olive oil exclusively.
 Pa amb Oli is a simple summer dinner: bread with olive oil, tomato, and whatever toppings you have on hand, like cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns except those that indicate your "Sie" should be capitalized, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between certain verbs and their objects.
 This also makes reading easier, although it makes writing more complicated, because you need to judge whether a verb or adjective is being used as a noun.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are pronounced exactly as they are spelled.
 The main letters to be aware of are c and g, because their pronunciation is based on the following vowel changes.
 Also, make sure to pronounce r and rr differently: “caro” means “dear” and “carro” means “cart.”
 Persian grammar is relatively simple and regular.
 Therefore, reading this grammar book will help you to master more Persian grammar and better understand the phrases.
 There is no doubt that if you speak a Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, anyone who knows a little Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is very similar and that it is not necessary to learn it separately.
 Nowadays, most of the pre-modern observatories have been decommissioned and only preserved as museums or educational facilities.
 Because light pollution was not as bad as it is now during its heyday, observatories were often built in urban areas or on college campuses, making them easier to reach than modern observatories.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge facilities located in remote areas with good atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami, also known as “flower viewing,” has been a Japanese custom since the 8th century.
 The concept comes from China, where the plum blossom is a popular flower.
 In Japan, the earliest cherry blossom parties were held by the emperor for himself and other members of the royal family at the imperial palace.
 Plants are best in their natural environment. So resist the temptation to pick them, even if it is “just one.”
 If you are visiting a carefully landscaped garden, collecting “specimens” will also get you evicted, with no room for negotiation.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, navigation is easy and once you arrive you can buy almost anything.
 But because you are in the “high tropics” a few degrees north of the equator, you will need to deal with both high heat (year-round) and strong sun (when the weather is clear, which is relatively rare).
 A few buses also headed north to Hebron, the traditional burial site of the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob and their wives.
 Please confirm that you intend to take the bus to Hebron, and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a great theme for a holiday.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, or taking a river cruise to explore the charming cities along the Danube.
 They also clearly mark the routes for popular hiking and biking trails.
 Christmas is one of the most important Christian holidays, established to celebrate the birth of Christ.
 Many of the traditions associated with this holiday are also embraced by non-Christians in Christian countries and by non-Christians around the world.
 One tradition is to stay up all night on Easter Sunday to watch the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has its Christian theological explanation, but it is very likely that it was a celebration of spring and a prayer for a good harvest that existed before the birth of Christ.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter Vigils on Saturday nights during Holy Week, with the congregation usually arriving at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 Initially, animals arrived on the islands by swimming, flying, or floating.
 Because the islands are so far from the mainland, mammals cannot travel there to graze, so the giant turtles are the main herbivores on the islands.
 When humans arrived on the Galapagos Islands, they introduced many mammals, including sheep, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic during the winter, you will experience polar night, a period of time when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This provides a great opportunity to see the Northern Lights, as the sky will be dark for most of the day.
 These areas are sparsely populated and generally free of light pollution, so you can enjoy a brilliant night sky.
 Compared to the work culture of Westerners, the Japanese work culture is more obvious in the hierarchy system and more formal.
 Business attire is standard, and colleagues refer to each other by their surnames or job titles.
 A harmonious workplace atmosphere is essential, emphasizing team effort rather than individual achievement.
 Employees must get approval from their superiors for any decision they make, and must unconditionally obey their instructions.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.29193615439235626, 'precisions': [0.6258801375470772, 0.3585582507687052, 0.22786109623281556, 0.14902767389678384], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9880772138496093, 'length_ratio': 0.9881477286517536, 'translation_length': 24428, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 57.75155911595115, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8702927928550441, 'scores': [0.8030540943145752, 0.8788638114929199, 0.8846964836120605, 0.7361851334571838, 0.7515382766723633, 0.8188711404800415, 0.9395896792411804, 0.8363437056541443, 0.8990358710289001, 0.8981311321258545, 0.9090725183486938, 0.8246486783027649, 0.8754342198371887, 0.8153813481330872, 0.8317345976829529, 0.8008843064308167, 0.8557254672050476, 0.9243981242179871, 0.915104329586029, 0.8529398441314697, 0.9048625230789185, 0.9366366863250732, 0.8738650679588318, 0.8324767351150513, 0.872647225856781, 0.8702540993690491, 0.879543125629425, 0.9018623232841492, 0.816799521446228, 0.8835262656211853, 0.7926536798477173, 0.8430448174476624, 0.8017157912254333, 0.9005749821662903, 0.9421165585517883, 0.9236262440681458, 0.8727076649665833, 0.8319345712661743, 0.9037026762962341, 0.8906695246696472, 0.8381503224372864, 0.9472823143005371, 0.8927623629570007, 0.9057591557502747, 0.8320887684822083, 0.8802998661994934, 0.8849042057991028, 0.87981778383255, 0.9031037092208862, 0.9067294597625732, 0.8164096474647522, 0.9153315424919128, 0.898029625415802, 0.9108781814575195, 0.8795153498649597, 0.8480395674705505, 0.8316337466239929, 0.870134174823761, 0.9145293235778809, 0.935282289981842, 0.8444921374320984, 0.8941983580589294, 0.7990079522132874, 0.9086033701896667, 0.887383759021759, 0.8721769452095032, 0.8903711438179016, 0.7003931999206543, 0.9480708241462708, 0.8605363965034485, 0.8743047118186951, 0.8729581832885742, 0.8620172739028931, 0.878122866153717, 0.8519371151924133, 0.8712158799171448, 0.8801302313804626, 0.8980109095573425, 0.9453815817832947, 0.907944917678833, 0.9062643051147461, 0.9195062518119812, 0.8610498905181885, 0.8318686485290527, 0.8687589168548584, 0.8771417737007141, 0.8523536324501038, 0.8160214424133301, 0.8777040839195251, 0.8178595304489136, 0.8489150404930115, 0.8924906849861145, 0.881120502948761, 0.9391569495201111, 0.9170131087303162, 0.9014567732810974, 0.899749219417572, 0.8540120124816895, 0.9205746650695801, 0.8663932681083679, 0.9198532700538635, 0.8345223665237427, 0.8970207571983337, 0.9002453684806824, 0.8885557651519775, 0.8618160486221313, 0.8400241732597351, 0.8228306174278259, 0.8261135816574097, 0.7715803384780884, 0.895469069480896, 0.9382244944572449, 0.928283154964447, 0.9091344475746155, 0.8819631934165955, 0.8770105838775635, 0.8657042384147644, 0.8983083367347717, 0.9250178337097168, 0.8423105478286743, 0.8345244526863098, 0.8468683362007141, 0.9026151299476624, 0.912861168384552, 0.8652104735374451, 0.9189946055412292, 0.957135796546936, 0.8899540901184082, 0.8906815648078918, 0.9164912104606628, 0.8060451149940491, 0.8848694562911987, 0.8627484440803528, 0.9364609718322754, 0.6918292045593262, 0.8157407641410828, 0.8838946223258972, 0.89849454164505, 0.9202430844306946, 0.8755350708961487, 0.9447585940361023, 0.8677751421928406, 0.8765572905540466, 0.9307821393013, 0.8575618267059326, 0.9174289107322693, 0.8800761103630066, 0.8823915123939514, 0.8784823417663574, 0.8972716927528381, 0.9131540656089783, 0.9036827683448792, 0.8458161950111389, 0.8373057842254639, 0.8293190598487854, 0.8716158866882324, 0.8944408297538757, 0.8267579078674316, 0.9139396548271179, 0.9065603613853455, 0.9369176030158997, 0.8324655890464783, 0.8586381077766418, 0.9194385409355164, 0.8813603520393372, 0.8293564319610596, 0.8967147469520569, 0.7682049870491028, 0.8188770413398743, 0.8466043472290039, 0.9080163836479187, 0.9040524363517761, 0.8760281205177307, 0.887667715549469, 0.8816752433776855, 0.9142019152641296, 0.817260205745697, 0.8922274708747864, 0.6373738646507263, 0.8248162865638733, 0.9072615504264832, 0.8702337145805359, 0.887209951877594, 0.9086686968803406, 0.8886167407035828, 0.886820375919342, 0.9641194939613342, 0.8614894151687622, 0.8762695789337158, 0.8588020205497742, 0.8850530385971069, 0.8155589699745178, 0.839898407459259, 0.8961994051933289, 0.7869349718093872, 0.9023064970970154, 0.8701860904693604, 0.8476874232292175, 0.9035491347312927, 0.8205717206001282, 0.7679827213287354, 0.7951900362968445, 0.7703024744987488, 0.8292751908302307, 0.8970275521278381, 0.9038859009742737, 0.852512538433075, 0.8786985278129578, 0.9119932055473328, 0.8866499066352844, 0.9339820146560669, 0.9027940630912781, 0.8967875838279724, 0.9245848059654236, 0.89881831407547, 0.926186740398407, 0.9328212141990662, 0.8977916240692139, 0.8559496998786926, 0.8909302353858948, 0.8788439035415649, 0.9095460772514343, 0.9014634490013123, 0.8891822099685669, 0.7776497006416321, 0.9307072758674622, 0.8507516980171204, 0.8218671083450317, 0.8886978626251221, 0.7478482127189636, 0.9416308999061584, 0.7727699279785156, 0.851245641708374, 0.8646541237831116, 0.8696306943893433, 0.9138873219490051, 0.8757705092430115, 0.8956938982009888, 0.8903185725212097, 0.8925885558128357, 0.8201274275779724, 0.739304780960083, 0.9032137989997864, 0.8749436736106873, 0.8569300770759583, 0.8771485090255737, 0.8507552146911621, 0.8091917634010315, 0.7904078364372253, 0.9462630152702332, 0.8555985689163208, 0.9070726037025452, 0.8987864851951599, 0.9346585869789124, 0.9201199412345886, 0.8863490223884583, 0.904980480670929, 0.8655297756195068, 0.7517042756080627, 0.8137050271034241, 0.908229410648346, 0.8737262487411499, 0.7616082429885864, 0.80046147108078, 0.9314797520637512, 0.8921152949333191, 0.7777698040008545, 0.8831169009208679, 0.9180210828781128, 0.8533260226249695, 0.8692160248756409, 0.8229528665542603, 0.8466701507568359, 0.8526275157928467, 0.7378243803977966, 0.768905758857727, 0.8123654127120972, 0.8349435329437256, 0.9212585091590881, 0.962300717830658, 0.8930626511573792, 0.8789587020874023, 0.8666415810585022, 0.8303079009056091, 0.9036558270454407, 0.9324965476989746, 0.865953266620636, 0.8758817911148071, 0.900753378868103, 0.88320392370224, 0.8585653901100159, 0.85547935962677, 0.9098367094993591, 0.7538426518440247, 0.8418647050857544, 0.8598472476005554, 0.8541983366012573, 0.8708991408348083, 0.6793569922447205, 0.8916680216789246, 0.9298874139785767, 0.8880134224891663, 0.8131114840507507, 0.9189662933349609, 0.8504298329353333, 0.882706880569458, 0.8683845400810242, 0.8063883185386658, 0.8875979781150818, 0.9005654454231262, 0.9416853785514832, 0.8906577229499817, 0.8955433964729309, 0.7220348119735718, 0.9603500962257385, 0.8870541453361511, 0.8915987610816956, 0.8391757607460022, 0.8665632605552673, 0.9225703477859497, 0.7929624915122986, 0.8078806400299072, 0.8966091275215149, 0.8369783759117126, 0.8857079148292542, 0.869250476360321, 0.8612176775932312, 0.8183628916740417, 0.9167493581771851, 0.9127981066703796, 0.889432430267334, 0.8515672087669373, 0.9034003615379333, 0.9313947558403015, 0.9392971396446228, 0.8653107285499573, 0.9121703505516052, 0.8544902205467224, 0.8411781191825867, 0.8948455452919006, 0.7684207558631897, 0.8876761198043823, 0.8198683261871338, 0.8718803524971008, 0.9147288203239441, 0.8163329362869263, 0.9091858267784119, 0.8633645176887512, 0.8910099864006042, 0.8369349837303162, 0.8549323678016663, 0.8289182782173157, 0.8439079523086548, 0.8753700852394104, 0.906735360622406, 0.8838668465614319, 0.8848886489868164, 0.8579881191253662, 0.8382053375244141, 0.8437635898590088, 0.8209231495857239, 0.824690580368042, 0.9031562209129333, 0.8576522469520569, 0.8611385226249695, 0.8217131495475769, 0.8329945206642151, 0.8189120888710022, 0.7962769865989685, 0.8386333584785461, 0.7614889144897461, 0.8426526188850403, 0.8668676614761353, 0.9040342569351196, 0.8804145455360413, 0.9076926112174988, 0.9412898421287537, 0.9029563069343567, 0.8464708924293518, 0.8977384567260742, 0.9193558096885681, 0.786190927028656, 0.8038483262062073, 0.7811347842216492, 0.8966723680496216, 0.8672822117805481, 0.7751994729042053, 0.8551608920097351, 0.881483793258667, 0.9027730822563171, 0.9079033732414246, 0.913663923740387, 0.857010006904602, 0.841322124004364, 0.9274529814720154, 0.8501525521278381, 0.8372128009796143, 0.924053966999054, 0.8357749581336975, 0.8593595623970032, 0.899089515209198, 0.8831891417503357, 0.890853226184845, 0.8800669312477112, 0.8427185416221619, 0.8562503457069397, 0.874963641166687, 0.8782047629356384, 0.9061174392700195, 0.9054011106491089, 0.8593279123306274, 0.7641741633415222, 0.8070979714393616, 0.8144575357437134, 0.9034259915351868, 0.8434107899665833, 0.8703293800354004, 0.8038648962974548, 0.8856727480888367, 0.9348930716514587, 0.9352099299430847, 0.9134342074394226, 0.840105414390564, 0.852846622467041, 0.8681123852729797, 0.9055734872817993, 0.8917611241340637, 0.8785420060157776, 0.8227444887161255, 0.9512304067611694, 0.9090241193771362, 0.8470677733421326, 0.8633477687835693, 0.8838568925857544, 0.8423530459403992, 0.8397486209869385, 0.8736721277236938, 0.8695909380912781, 0.8610870242118835, 0.7431913614273071, 0.9006414413452148, 0.8872861266136169, 0.9222862124443054, 0.9005902409553528, 0.8487566113471985, 0.8992842435836792, 0.8205487728118896, 0.8421175479888916, 0.9340665340423584, 0.8678845167160034, 0.871849536895752, 0.8267129063606262, 0.8771693110466003, 0.8391280770301819, 0.8672478199005127, 0.8010615110397339, 0.798511266708374, 0.9205979704856873, 0.8162127137184143, 0.8478207588195801, 0.9194269180297852, 0.8680068254470825, 0.8752204775810242, 0.8979560732841492, 0.8400782942771912, 0.8577082753181458, 0.8836464285850525, 0.8246813416481018, 0.7312129139900208, 0.8452160954475403, 0.8505897521972656, 0.8289976716041565, 0.8598460555076599, 0.8483574986457825, 0.7866219878196716, 0.9239673614501953, 0.8802804946899414, 0.8871151804924011, 0.8242062926292419, 0.9071443676948547, 0.8315355181694031, 0.8419294953346252, 0.8777370452880859, 0.8959273099899292, 0.900286853313446, 0.8564431071281433, 0.8558452725410461, 0.807417094707489, 0.8907217979431152, 0.8741044402122498, 0.8909753561019897, 0.907356321811676, 0.9443398714065552, 0.8705613613128662, 0.8345752358436584, 0.8650184273719788, 0.81393963098526, 0.8842251300811768, 0.8822700381278992, 0.876995861530304, 0.9109216332435608, 0.9060094356536865, 0.8826865553855896, 0.8793792724609375, 0.877236545085907, 0.9402349591255188, 0.8771642446517944, 0.8669382333755493, 0.8617571592330933, 0.8302677869796753, 0.681887686252594, 0.8239920139312744, 0.8962517380714417, 0.8634940981864929, 0.9013715982437134, 0.9331815242767334, 0.8012572526931763, 0.9357658624649048, 0.8301662802696228, 0.9395052790641785, 0.8987476229667664, 0.9138090014457703, 0.8720885515213013, 0.8652214407920837, 0.8976154923439026, 0.8284799456596375, 0.8712893724441528, 0.8353588581085205, 0.8431336879730225, 0.9152197241783142, 0.8659636974334717, 0.8995216488838196, 0.8273960947990417, 0.8761911988258362, 0.8704739212989807, 0.8391448855400085, 0.8687689900398254, 0.822924792766571, 0.8551427125930786, 0.8947342038154602, 0.856644332408905, 0.8961806297302246, 0.8779940009117126, 0.8437375426292419, 0.8580983877182007, 0.9188751578330994, 0.8444426655769348, 0.8860849142074585, 0.8418598771095276, 0.8923353552818298, 0.8308681845664978, 0.886725664138794, 0.8302850723266602, 0.8874689936637878, 0.9283923506736755, 0.8684620261192322, 0.8038181662559509, 0.8256658911705017, 0.66985684633255, 0.8348739147186279, 0.8629848957061768, 0.872924268245697, 0.8816443681716919, 0.7953658103942871, 0.8167989253997803, 0.8759549856185913, 0.8769436478614807, 0.8472901582717896, 0.8609274625778198, 0.8334103226661682, 0.8950539231300354, 0.9041618704795837, 0.8578472137451172, 0.8454766869544983, 0.868485152721405, 0.7299058437347412, 0.863680362701416, 0.871029794216156, 0.88499516248703, 0.879030168056488, 0.8000936508178711, 0.90754634141922, 0.8921187520027161, 0.8349432349205017, 0.8074812293052673, 0.8902594447135925, 0.8491621017456055, 0.8790102005004883, 0.777990996837616, 0.8015102744102478, 0.915823757648468, 0.9093754887580872, 0.8531244397163391, 0.9119772911071777, 0.9165316224098206, 0.9017613530158997, 0.8692310452461243, 0.8758950233459473, 0.8209558129310608, 0.8527974486351013, 0.8778515458106995, 0.8599095940589905, 0.8659968972206116, 0.8964007496833801, 0.8871534466743469, 0.9005685448646545, 0.824794352054596, 0.7497132420539856, 0.7991710305213928, 0.8468623757362366, 0.8947060704231262, 0.9191878437995911, 0.9089317917823792, 0.8927892446517944, 0.9011313319206238, 0.9019790291786194, 0.9295900464057922, 0.9421040415763855, 0.8876363039016724, 0.8972272276878357, 0.892719566822052, 0.8546733260154724, 0.8925936222076416, 0.8557801246643066, 0.9163351058959961, 0.8811296820640564, 0.9201866984367371, 0.7987011075019836, 0.9113468527793884, 0.8816586136817932, 0.8848406672477722, 0.9093660712242126, 0.9343835711479187, 0.9106921553611755, 0.9758555293083191, 0.9060027599334717, 0.9005624055862427, 0.8975513577461243, 0.9200742244720459, 0.8724319934844971, 0.9083924889564514, 0.9527949690818787, 0.8579139709472656, 0.858781635761261, 0.8659423589706421, 0.8691148161888123, 0.8561026453971863, 0.8754984140396118, 0.8511002063751221, 0.9021660685539246, 0.9623832106590271, 0.904684841632843, 0.6937375664710999, 0.8211429715156555, 0.7988793849945068, 0.9192742705345154, 0.9012430310249329, 0.8903152942657471, 0.8041101098060608, 0.9050963521003723, 0.8468826413154602, 0.9261627197265625, 0.9183377623558044, 0.8817973732948303, 0.8989920020103455, 0.9001523852348328, 0.8903831243515015, 0.9193259477615356, 0.897760808467865, 0.9163408279418945, 0.8670497536659241, 0.9081953763961792, 0.8815425038337708, 0.8985903263092041, 0.9262276887893677, 0.9090604186058044, 0.8867923021316528, 0.8842481970787048, 0.8934556841850281, 0.9329524636268616, 0.8864333033561707, 0.9288656115531921, 0.8909555077552795, 0.8786410093307495, 0.8658236861228943, 0.8974152207374573, 0.9159512519836426, 0.9025991559028625, 0.9050217866897583, 0.8692436814308167, 0.9165834784507751, 0.8770344853401184, 0.8877546191215515, 0.856332540512085, 0.7739725708961487, 0.8830013871192932, 0.8708988428115845, 0.929585874080658, 0.8529368042945862, 0.896885871887207, 0.8437603116035461, 0.8983810544013977, 0.8747356534004211, 0.8677780032157898, 0.8612586259841919, 0.8814141750335693, 0.826866090297699, 0.896249532699585, 0.902496874332428, 0.9094167351722717, 0.8886477947235107, 0.8433141112327576, 0.9081592559814453, 0.9168850779533386, 0.8834755420684814, 0.8857633471488953, 0.9110445976257324, 0.7689064145088196, 0.9085328578948975, 0.8271661996841431, 0.7340604662895203, 0.8797346949577332, 0.8665745854377747, 0.9102043509483337, 0.9255712032318115, 0.9006891846656799, 0.8214706778526306, 0.8140173554420471, 0.8071069121360779, 0.8636247515678406, 0.8782718777656555, 0.8980301022529602, 0.8788957595825195, 0.9200848340988159, 0.8700812458992004, 0.7769743800163269, 0.8957090973854065, 0.8666837811470032, 0.8468242287635803, 0.9000316858291626, 0.903506875038147, 0.8310002684593201, 0.8804685473442078, 0.9032639861106873, 0.9245949387550354, 0.8678359985351562, 0.9098696708679199, 0.8680651783943176, 0.8501564860343933, 0.8807619214057922, 0.9278406500816345, 0.9278568029403687, 0.8725610375404358, 0.8690986037254333, 0.8205786347389221, 0.9007593989372253, 0.8513217568397522, 0.8845096230506897, 0.9057908058166504, 0.878539502620697, 0.9322461485862732, 0.9129839539527893, 0.9289707541465759, 0.8707911968231201, 0.8938773274421692, 0.9251888990402222, 0.919665515422821, 0.9139848947525024, 0.9284889698028564, 0.9573909640312195, 0.8636398911476135, 0.9119364619255066, 0.8875630497932434, 0.9094839096069336, 0.8954804539680481, 0.7872817516326904, 0.8767078518867493, 0.9023541212081909, 0.9120407104492188, 0.8580001592636108, 0.9203242659568787, 0.8477992415428162, 0.9262468218803406, 0.7920017838478088, 0.8298882842063904, 0.7809853553771973, 0.9403654336929321, 0.8577048778533936, 0.9005550742149353, 0.8720597624778748, 0.8962873816490173, 0.8739200234413147, 0.8741623759269714, 0.9019657373428345, 0.862887442111969, 0.8747931122779846, 0.9490393996238708, 0.827668309211731, 0.8678887486457825, 0.8632918000221252, 0.8726770281791687, 0.8991303443908691, 0.9129400253295898, 0.8759259581565857, 0.8593297600746155, 0.8399708867073059, 0.8522191047668457, 0.890171229839325, 0.8630499243736267, 0.8469614386558533, 0.8963544964790344, 0.7760492563247681, 0.9232327342033386, 0.9064515233039856, 0.8757951855659485, 0.8263096809387207, 0.8411038517951965, 0.862412691116333, 0.8637245297431946, 0.9000712037086487, 0.8829811215400696, 0.7951530814170837, 0.8910143375396729, 0.8459822535514832, 0.899438202381134, 0.9220851063728333, 0.8244192004203796, 0.8110304474830627, 0.8947399258613586, 0.8877995610237122, 0.8425981402397156, 0.8847230076789856, 0.8463613390922546, 0.7889679074287415, 0.8989937901496887, 0.8268700242042542, 0.888684093952179, 0.8510866761207581, 0.8569390177726746, 0.8948403596878052, 0.8637511134147644, 0.8119967579841614, 0.8393663167953491, 0.8762001991271973, 0.8390864729881287, 0.8189058899879456, 0.7904236316680908, 0.8639904856681824, 0.7904447913169861, 0.869352400302887, 0.879750669002533, 0.8982293009757996, 0.906088650226593, 0.8957706689834595, 0.8188310265541077, 0.8128543496131897, 0.8483240604400635, 0.8865917325019836, 0.7239527106285095, 0.916345477104187, 0.884911835193634, 0.8813212513923645, 0.9194279313087463, 0.881119430065155, 0.8756158947944641, 0.8707398176193237, 0.8747814297676086, 0.8859164118766785, 0.918533444404602, 0.9035429358482361, 0.9073942303657532, 0.8257316946983337, 0.8662828803062439, 0.9129114747047424, 0.9213133454322815, 0.8990405201911926, 0.9569562673568726, 0.887513279914856, 0.9516944289207458, 0.8291839957237244, 0.8772405385971069, 0.9184539318084717, 0.907106876373291, 0.8879178166389465, 0.8696846961975098, 0.8359048962593079, 0.8652331233024597, 0.8160056471824646, 0.8486028909683228, 0.8267314434051514, 0.7979149222373962, 0.8344982266426086, 0.8269386887550354, 0.7629456520080566, 0.843514621257782, 0.8471838235855103, 0.8673697710037231, 0.8710477948188782, 0.9127236604690552, 0.8801034092903137, 0.8285966515541077, 0.7588650584220886, 0.8730176091194153, 0.8813457489013672, 0.8757548928260803, 0.8597425222396851, 0.8709991574287415, 0.8571088910102844, 0.8291077017784119, 0.9442585110664368, 0.8233934044837952, 0.8321221470832825, 0.9336857199668884, 0.8982840180397034, 0.868413507938385, 0.8860374093055725, 0.9061228632926941, 0.831680953502655, 0.8477074503898621, 0.8838366866111755, 0.931425929069519, 0.8739851117134094, 0.8736274838447571, 0.8725829720497131, 0.8809605836868286, 0.8573874235153198, 0.8840398788452148, 0.8255744576454163, 0.8565065264701843, 0.8211612701416016, 0.9081328511238098, 0.826399564743042, 0.7880589365959167, 0.8966315388679504, 0.8147018551826477, 0.8550427556037903, 0.8658488392829895, 0.9326469898223877, 0.9395922422409058, 0.8854150772094727, 0.8851978182792664, 0.9315791130065918, 0.8974851369857788, 0.9091856479644775, 0.8622291684150696, 0.8740535378456116, 0.8725621104240417, 0.870213508605957, 0.7749641537666321, 0.9331009984016418, 0.8354166150093079, 0.8430942893028259, 0.8546936511993408, 0.9283139109611511, 0.806235134601593, 0.9093566536903381, 0.9073176980018616, 0.8466290831565857, 0.8666742444038391, 0.9367402195930481, 0.8652286529541016, 0.8586397767066956, 0.8844707608222961, 0.8344007134437561, 0.9239819645881653, 0.8645994663238525, 0.8217151761054993, 0.8125090003013611, 0.8638858795166016, 0.7906969785690308, 0.900152862071991, 0.8676658868789673, 0.7338806390762329, 0.9139812588691711, 0.8721119165420532, 0.9125850796699524, 0.8763653635978699, 0.8081642985343933, 0.9220189452171326, 0.8718698620796204, 0.8583136200904846, 0.8787693977355957, 0.8736187815666199, 0.8404520153999329, 0.9387577772140503, 0.8773199915885925, 0.9106041789054871, 0.881821870803833, 0.7805553078651428, 0.8418391346931458, 0.9265948534011841, 0.8940072655677795, 0.9043707847595215, 0.8845816254615784, 0.9298148155212402, 0.8851175308227539, 0.9276672005653381, 0.9264687299728394, 0.883637011051178, 0.827110230922699, 0.8468575477600098, 0.8510704040527344, 0.9052655100822449, 0.7676665186882019, 0.9050031304359436, 0.9029103517532349, 0.8089335560798645, 0.8700892329216003, 0.8488003015518188, 0.8915509581565857, 0.9156437516212463, 0.8805794715881348]}